That promise of post-election flexibility has spurred criticism and derision from numerous GOP activists and conservatives, including GOP presidential front-runner Mitt Romney, House Speaker John Boehner and strategist Karl Rove.
as fingers
Thanks to everyone that has sent me Squares for our Olympic Blanket, the Challenge has now ended and it's my turn now to get busy with your Squares! I will do a final count as soon as I can and let you know how many we managed to get in.
5. Dancing in the moonlight
With increasing dissatisfaction toward the party of Madibe, President Nelson Mandela, the ANC’s current failed leadership in the form of Jacob Zuma, which has been disastrous on almost every level – in the delivery of basic services to all South Africans (water, electricity, housing, food), the fight against rampant crime, and in the need to protect LGBTI people against hateful sexuality violence, This DASO campaign might be just what the doctor ordered or it could send the opposition party running for cover!
I actually somehow have a full set of all four of these, the other three being Strength, Hierophant, and Johnny. (There were a couple variants as well.) Strength was a monster with a chainsaw, Hierophant was a Gillman/fish monster, and as ToyFare put it, Johnny looked like...we'll see tomorrow. I need to see if I can dig the rest of them up, but there were several little pack-ins as well, like frog and fish monsters. Since these predate my Year-in-Toys posts, I haven't the foggiest what I actually paid for the lot of them; but I want to say they were pretty reasonable, if not dirt cheap. Fun figures for a fun game, and one I've actually played for a change!
2 Thessalonians 3: 1-2
in-between these worlds
“All over this world now, anguish rules. Causes are not above the need for coming together. Causes are now seen in perspective of the greater good for the whole of all peoples. The greater good leads the way now.
Safe Route to School Public Health Program Coordinator at Injury Prevention Services, Gail Carlson, aims to use the program to attract new walkers and bicyclists and create healthy competition between classes, schools and school districts. Ms. Carlson is finalizing the logistics before the May 2nd roll out date, such as training program administrators, parents, principal, and school staff. She sees the bar code program as the natural next step for any Safe Routes to School program because counting students is efficient, data is more trackable, and motivation of parents and students is easier to leverage. The real-time reporting capabilities provides an opportunity to find creative rewards and incentive programs.
But his comments on the death of a man who masterminded the deaths of thousands of innocent civilians around the world are likely to raise further doubts about his suitability for high office in London, where Al Qaeda bombings killed 52 in July 2005.
It varies every year but is always mid to late January. I’ve just got back from Pilates so am feeling quite buoyant. Still I do get it, its grey and we are seemingly a million miles from payday.
Next, we need to go into F—PBX and create a CUSTOM trunk. So go to Trunks, Add Trunk, Add Custom Trunk and you only need to enter four settings:
Instead, we should relax, and approach our problems with the calm assurance that He is with us; our partner and our help in all situations. It is then that we will be able to most effectively face our challenges.
I've written about it a couple of dozen times and it's a beer that Evin and the rest of the Kernel gang can't brew fast enough.
There is room for discussion. The boss might as well accept for his request. Or might consider an other person to do the work.
Dark flooring
Exercise this past week: 4 morning workouts, 19.2 miles run as well as Saturday and a 3 mile walk with a friend
He had worked for the ICRC and the British Red Cross for many years, carrying out assignments in Somalia, Afghanistan and Iraq.
RV23
Flowers on display from my friend KC
It could also be quarterly, but I get the feeling that four times a year is too few.
Commenter Jillicentix suggested a vibrating bracelet or ring instead of a tattoo. Many felt a tattoo was far too drastic a measure to take for the simple purpose of not missing alerts from your phone.
BSYO woodwind tutor Tony Grimm has had a unique view of the 25-year relationship, having been one of the first students to take up a BSYO scholarship (on bassoon). Having received his Bachelor in Music degree, and now studying for his Masters, Tony has gone on to play with at least five major Australian orchestras and continues to lend a wealth of experience to today's BSYO players, coming to practice weekly by train from Sydney and going on all tours.
Here is the recipe for my version, feel free to try it out, and think of me when you tuck in to that sweet sweet pizza goodness!
things started to feel weird, he wouldnt sleep with me, wouldnt pay any attention to me, wouldnt even touch me.
If you’re not in a rush then I would wait until you’ve booked a photographer for your wedding. Using your wedding photographer will give you a chance to get to know each other so on your wedding day you’re both a little more relaxed in front of his camera. You may also be able to get a deal on an engagement shoot since you’ve booked him for the wedding.
* A physical dictionary (either or spelling or definitions)
Why? Because without it there's no limit to be observed
I definitely feel if my life would just fall into place or I could put it all into place my immune system and my health would soar even higher.
“No, I’ve never been accused or convicted of a crime. I’ve never been pardoned,” I blurted.
“Oh. Yeah. Yeah, now he’s messing with us,” Nikolas announced.
"Can we kill it?" This far from a Sherim, Rel didn't fancy trying to draw the creature back to its own Realm, but not all Wildren could be killed in the First Realm. How did you hurt a cloud?
What’s more, she seems to have no meaningful relationships apart from her bond with the Obama White House: no friends or siblings or extended family, no husband (“Julia decides to have a child,” is all the slide show says), a son who disappears once school starts and parents who only matter because Obamacare grants her the privilege of staying on their health care plan until she’s 26. This lends the whole production a curiously patriarchal quality, with Obama as a beneficent Daddy Warbucks and Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan co-starring as the wicked uncles threatening to steal Julia’s inheritance.
Joni, Megan and Linda recently cozied up (well, as cozy as Skype allows!) to the warm and chatty Martyn Lawrence Bullard to discuss his career, how he got to be the decorator to the stars, his time on "Million Dollar Decorators" (Season 2 is rumored to be shooting now!) his new book "Live, Love & Decorate" and his various product endorsements. This is one busy - and talented - man!
So don't tell me anything. Even though I kinda know where it's going because I read too many blogs and have too many friends who watched it for six years.
But…folks…we’ve come really…really…really far. We’ve made impressive strides in our gym and in our training and we’ve done things I only dreamed about three years ago.
And tried calling LAN.
exceed 9 billion in this timeframe.
Mr. Obama, who arrived after nightfall at Bagram Air Base north of Kabul under a veil of secrecy, flew by helicopter to the palace, passing low over the inky silhouette of the Hindu Kush Mountain range. Once there, he met briefly with Mr. Karzai before they emerged to sign the pact.
Dear Author,
"Isaiah of the Exile: 'How Beautiful on the Mountains'"
Scott was at the Coldplay show the other day in Vancouver and basically likened Snow Patrol to a little Coldplay. Snow Patrol is good, but Coldplay are the masters. And I think what I took from Scott after seeing both Snow Patrol and Coldplay… is that Coldplay is one of the biggest bands in the world for a reason. But we couldn’t quite pin down what that reason is… Scott says a lot of what Snow Patrol does, Coldplay does, but with Chris Martin it came off as more believable?
Seven hopped whiskey recipes reveal multiple ways to get the hops’ nose, taste, and tang into the bottle. Some, such as dry hopping, are familiar to brewers, but hopping whiskey is not exactly the same as hopping beer. Distillers work with a sealed vessel, so there’s no just tossing in hops as brewers do during the cooking of the beer. Bell’s solution? A handmade double-valved hop insertion pipe for the still that allows distillers to add hops at particular points in the run. He also deploys hop backs, hop teas, and hopbursting, a technique that introduces massive amounts of hops late in the process that allows the distiller to amplify the hops aroma (and a bit of bitterness).
Beat 3 eggs with 80 gr. of sugar. Working for a long time until mixture is light and puffy. Add the vanilla and, little by little, potato starch and cornstarch, stirring constantly. Finally, add the yeast. Pour into a rectangular shallow roasting pan covered with parchment paper. Bake at 150/160°C for about 15 minutes.
Do beautifully presented gourmet baskets have a place in a house of mourning? Does a bit of fresh Norweigian lox on a marble bagel imported from one of NY's finest kosher bakeries, followed by a croissant spread with a Swiss jam and a fine glass of herbal tea really make all the difference? "Wow, I just HAD to have something from that Deepest Sympathy basket or I would have been so weak."
Just cuz a guy says something …don’t make it so. Oh…..you knew that ….…didn ya?
Among those invited are members of upper and lower houses of the Russian parliament, Constitutional Court judges, government officials, federal authorities and representatives of the diplomatic corps.
I received this arc through NetGalley and I would like to thank the publisher and the author for giving me a copy of this book.
This quick make was just the right answer, the only mildly time
ON TAP NOW
Those with fast-held religious views might see life in this world as suffering from which we want to escape, or in other words, a big NO. Scientific materialists would see life as a material event, scientifically unfolding but devoid of any purpose or meaning. A big NEUTRAL. But others see life as a big GOOD at a fundamental level. “That doesn’t necessarily mean that everything that happens in life is good,” he writes. “Of course, many things occur within the process that are tragic, painful, senseless and even evil. But “. . . the essence of the experience is fundamentally good.”
1 anytime
So now I have THE bike, I need to get practicing on it now and await the big day to arrive. (86 days to go, not that I’m counting!)
the horror that gripped our nation
Seriously???!!!! Even though you actually acknowledged my requests (remember that Yup?) even though you had to STEP OVER THE GROCERIES in order to make dinner, it didn’t occur to you to put them away?
I won't lie: I'm a little peeved at Sally at the moment as I was hoping she'd link to my secretary piece from last Wednesday in her regular Friday links post but she didn't. Sally knows I don't hold a grudge but she should definitely keep her distance for the next week or two.
*Sleep?: Still sleeping well, except for the many bathroom breaks. My biggest issue is falling asleep this week...I toss and turn for 30 min-1hr before I fall asleep. Just can't get comfortable....but once I am asleep, I sleep just fine!
1 bought
In fact Lee and I have become such close friends that when my father passed away in late 2009, it was Lee who first came to my side to console me. I now want to be there for her and Tim as they grieve their mother.
TH: It’s like chess you see. You and I may make the same move, let’s say starting out e2 to e4. Ok?
Friend: Ask the conductor to let you off at the cemetery stop.
From the perspective that everything should be right and good (which is what I still wake up with every day), the sin-smashed state of this world leaves us shell-shocked. But from the perspective that we have all chosen to turn our back on the One from whom all life comes, I’m also shell-shocked that life goes on as much as it does. I’ve had the opportunity to be in an anatomy and physiology class lately and the unthinkable genius of my own body is overwhelming. If just one group of cells decided not to do its job or my tiny capillaries suddenly decided not to allow the exchange of oxygen and carbon dioxide, I would die instantly. Explanation of these processes is most often impossible—all scientists can do is describe the few bits of data they’ve managed to observe. And yet here we all are, pumping blood and breathing, moving and speaking and seeing and hearing every second of every day for decades. Sure, things go wrong but not nearly all that could. We still have gravity to count on and seasons and day and night and the vast majority of children grow and most cars on the road stay on the road. Considering the potential for problems, there’s a lot of life happening here on this planet. This extravagance of mercy is from the hands of Jesus. He is the image of the invisible God, the firstborn of all creation. For by him all things were created, in heaven and on earth, visible and invisible, whether thrones or dominions or rulers or authorities—all things were created through him and for him. And he is before all things, and in him all things hold together. Jesus holds all things together, using his authority over all the powers that operate in this world to bring them, even in sin, to his goals and purposes. For in him all the fullness of God was pleased to dwell, and through him to reconcile to himself all things, whether on earth or in heaven, making peace by the blood of his cross. The goal is reconciliation, a drawing back of all creation back to its Creator. Jesus makes gravity work so we have the chance to know Him and discover that life, as good and as bad as it is now, is nothing compared to what it could be. So when something big or little goes wrong, an accurate theodicy will result in gratitude and trust that I have so much good from the hands of Jesus that I count on it every day and that tragedy is tragedy, not the norm.
Mark Bavis, 31, West Newton, Mass.
half a century of tensions. I spoke about the prospects of improved
anyway, since i had a lot more time on my hands and didn’t know what to do with myself, i took on a task that i had procrastinated for weeks: cleaning & reorganizing my studio.
Let me know if The Husband Project is working for you. Is it hard for you to come up with ideas or is it easy? Does your husband notice? (Not mine, but it's kind of neat because I feel like I have my own little secret - I wonder when will he catch on?) Does him noticing (or not noticing) make you want to try harder or just give up? Well, don't give up. This is just the beginning.
This was just some broke-ass, lazy fucker with a nicotine fix that needed a smoke and saw an unguarded pack of cigs and a source of ignition.
Do you have a Token Single Friend?? Or are YOU the Token Single Friend?? Tell me of your experiences!!
It can't be considered an achievement, I know, but I did receive 2 lovely parcels in the post which made me smile. A lot.
I'm taking a turn from the norm here, and posting about a fun creative project my friend Lisa and I did. Lisa's husband (who is a good friend of mine and Jordan's) turned 29 last week, and Lisa wanted to throw a surprise party for him this (unexpected) year before 30. She recruited me to help her, so we came up with lots of ideas for the big party. Lisa and her friend Jen run Farewell Paperie, and Lisa is a graphic designer full of ideas -- it was fun to brainstorm together.
Bibliography
Voila!
I hope you enjoy this read as much as I did.
Enter my daughters, both of whom have discovered horses and enjoy any time they can find on horseback.
"We're on the road, on our way, crossing bridges on to better days."
Source: www.indiaeducationreview.com
oil for frying
"Lyrical, resonant fables, which always point back to the primacy of family, friends, love, location, food and music. At once modern and mythic, her series deserves as much space as it can command of daydream nation's shrinking bookshelves."
Navarro
But, lots of cyclists still use panniers. If you go with panniers, don’t mess around—buy Ortliebs. They’re the only pannier that long-distance cyclists all agree upon in terms of waterproof-ness and durability. They are so waterproof you can dip an empty one in a lake, fill it up with water, and carry water in it. My two friends who I traveled with in Colombia (along with almost every other long distance cyclist I’ve met on the road) use them and love them.
Blue Jays, you betcha! '10 Topps Toppstown insert TTT9. The Russell Martin is a '11 Heritage Chrome towards the insanity set, one step closer to the magic number of 1500.
plastic mashers – 1 made big for dome electrics, 4 smaller ones for little domes
(iv) Disclosure of identity – This component is entirely free-standing. It cannot be satisfied by the existence of any one of the other three components. Crucially, the other three components are dependent on the existence of disclosure of identity, placing this component at the top of the hierarchy.
"Some people eschew anything they see as labels, and that's fine. But as a word lover, I kind of like walking around with a string of words attached to me. I picture them trailing out behind my head, fluttering a bit in an imaginary breeze as I move around: a banner of pride. Yeah, pretty fanciful mental image, I know. But anyway, I choose to attach these words to my person because I identify strongly with them: they make me happy to use, I feel like each one describes me well, and I just like them. Those words are my friends." April
The narrative of “Androzani” centers around bad, dumb luck, and something I took away from this DVD set was how easily the story itself could have been a failure if not for all of its components falling into the right places. Holmes hadn’t written for the show for six years. It’s borderline amazing that he was coaxed back and encouraged to write what’s arguably his finest script (out of many fine scripts) of the series.
Ah, Tam! ah, Tam! thou'lt get thy fairin' (deserts)!
The only other issue I had is completely out of DeStefano’s hands. I don’t like how damn big my version of the book is. It’s hard to hold in one hand and read. I love the cover – except for those stupid circles again! It’s making the subtleties of the cover way too obvious, and it annoys me. Kudos to whoever read the book and said, ‘We need the following details,’ but really. I can figure out what the points of interest are just by looking and reading the book. Those circles are stupid and pointless if you’ve not read it, and redundant if you have.
A broken soul stares from a pair of watering eyes,
2 tbsp turbinado/raw granulated sugar (optional but very pretty -- white sugar would work fine too)
He who has an ear, let him hear what the Spirit says to the churches. To the one who conquers I will give some of the hidden manna, and I will give him a white stone, with a new name written on the stone that no one knows except the one who receives it.'
culmination of this part of the poem, is not an accident.
I'm not sure if I announced her name here on my blog yet, but her name is going to be Morgan Lauri Watson. Lauri is my moms name and we just wanted to honor her by giving baby girl her name. I love it.
I salute our president, Comrade Oliver Tambo, for leading the ANC even under the most difficult circumstances.
Chaplins final speach in the Great Dictator
What else could I want?
5 And it came to pass, as he was telling the king how he had restored a dead body to life, that, behold, the woman, whose son he had restored to life, cried to the king for her house and for her land. And Gehazi said, My lord, O king, this is the woman, and this is her son, whom Elisha restored to life.
SW China’s Yunnan province, which borders Laos, Myanmar and Vietnam, is said to be the worst hit area.
“It acknowledges good policing which facilitated peaceful assemblies in Johor Baru, Kuantan, Malacca and Ipoh, and observations of unruly and violent behaviour on the part of some of the participants.
"Coke or Pepsi?"
Gandalf the Grey was a somewhat mysterious pilgrim who roamed Middle-earth and was friend to Free Peoples everywhere. He had many names in many lands: Gandalf (“wand-elf”) was his name among the Men of the North; he was known to Dwarves as Tharkûn (“staff-man”). Speakers of Sindarin – Elves and the high Men of Gondor – called him Mithrandir (“grey pilgrim”). Gandalf’s iconic attire consisted of “a tall pointed blue hat, a long grey cloak, … a silver scarf” and ”immense black boots”. He wielded a ”thorny staff” as well as Glamdring, an elf-blade of Gondolin. Gandalf had “long white hair”, a “sweeping silver beard”, ”broad shoulders”, and ”in his aged face under great snowy brows his eyes were set like coals that could suddenly burst into fire”. Indeed fire was central to Gandalf’s identity. As one of the five Wizards, he had been sent to Middle-earth to kindle hope in the hearts of the Free Peoples. He could ignite trees and pinecones to combat the enemy, as well as create blinding flashes of light. His fireworks were renowned among the Hobbits of the Shire. It seems likely that his inherent fiery nature was magnified by the power of Narya, the Ring of Fire, which he kept at the behest of Círdan the Shipwright. Of all the five Wizards, Gandalf was said to be the only one who did not fail at his appointed task, and he was the only one who showed any great interest in the race of Hobbits. His friendship with Hobbits would prove to be of vital import to the fate of Middle-earth and its Free Peoples. He is seen here arriving in the Shire for the celebration of Bilbo’s eleventy-first birthday, an occasion that will set in motion events sending Bilbo’s cousin and adopted heir, Frodo, on a long road into peril. But the peril does not belong to Frodo alone: Gandalf too shall face his greatest test in the dark days to come.
Only 5 of these test pressings exist, and this is the only one ever to be made available to the public. You can jump into the auction, win a cool Stone Axe collectible and benefit disaster relief at the Ripple Music Ebay Store.
If you store oil, chemicals, pesticides, solvents or even radioactive substances, its vital that they’re kept properly. If you want to complete a basic check on your arrangements, there’s an online tool which can help. What’s to know?
Who are Best Solution's staff? The agency's website provides links to the Facebook pages of Dan Grogan and Karri Hilland, but there are no staff bios on the website (most reputable agents' websites will not only name the agents, but provide some biographical information). Facebook is no help, since you can't read Mr. Grogan's or Ms. Hilland's personal info unless you friend them. Googling doesn't provide any joy, either. There's absolutely no way to ascertain whether these two agents have any qualifications to run a literary agency (more about that below).
Race Record: Starts 35; Wins: 5; 2nd: 7; 3rd: 5; Win & Place Prize Money: £88,919
*Black cardstock
Now, for the cover...
approx. 11-12" tall standing.
I don't really like the idea of a broken back for Christmas.
So I got all the ingredients out again, measured everything, and started over, at a much slower, slightly disheartened pace, have you. I used an egg white from an actual egg the second time around, and guess what? Even more liquid. Seems mother always does know best. And the dough was even stickier, too, like peanut butter. I tried to plop it onto the table, but it was glued to my fingers.
Again, feel free to chime in anytime. But remember, as usual, only if you agree!
By afternoon, police began searching for Vaux, described as “four feet, 10 inches, medium build; gray hair and full beard; ruddy complexion; wore blue overcoat with velvet collar; no vest; black derby hat; wears gold-rimmed eyeglasses; shirt has name on it.”
In a pot, heat oil. Add the chicken/lamb and brown on all sides. About 4 min on one side and 2-3 mins on the other. Add the onion, garlic, carrots, peas and mix well together. Add the hot water/stock slowly scrapping all the bits at the bottom. Bring to a boil. Then lower heat, add the zest and juice and let it cook covered on low heat for ~ 45 mins to an hour. Add olives and mix well. Let cook for another 10 mins.
So here we are a year + later and Lily is the girls age. I can't imagine throwing her into the system and expecting her to just adapt to the constant change, and she has had a good life, a happy happy girl, but I know even for a happy go lucky girl, that it would be difficult. This other little girl though, had been through hell, literally, and just needed a family of her own, someone to shape her and to mold her into the person she could be. Lately I have been feeling guilty, but I have to trust that she went to someone that could help her and dedicate the time and attention to her that she needed.
they, by far, stole Mother Nature's prize
The wheel should have the secret message or picture that peeks out when you turn it.
"Ares, CAG, you copy?" Neesa asked over the channel that was broad-casted between the squads and to the C.I.C.
Van Nath was accused of being a CIA agent and given electric shock torture, but he survived when his jailers found out he was one of Cambodia’s most prominent painters. And what did they make him paint?
Forced to abandon their vehicle, Aislinn and Dylan must cross the treacherous mountains on foot. Close behind is the military, whose corrupt leader must honor his pledge to the Eletarii to capture them. But as more guides appear to help Aislinn and Dylan, they are brought to the sanctuary of Emerald Lake.
Environmentally conscious...Drives the "small" Hummer.
People say that I am brave but I'm not
Place everything minus Jamsetta and sugar and put into a preserving pan.
When I arrived at the Air Force museum the only other person I could see was a guy mowing the lawns. I wasn’t too sure where to go to pay my entry, then the guy mowing the lawns wandered over, said hello and also took my admission fee (a couple of dollars) and I was free to explore the museum!
One day we spent hours trying to throw little rocks and pieces of cement into empty buckets and a rusty old wheelbarrow. On the days Boy drew pictures we’d practice the English words for what he’d drawn, and when we threw rocks into the wheelbarrow we celebrated with high fives, the yelling of “cha-CHING!” and a brief fist pump in the air to officially seal the deal. Who knew you could have so much
My waiter was very promptx very courteous, and checked on me often to make sure my water glass was full (I passed on the margaritas last night…), and if I needed anything else.
Seriously loves, you know how much I love my coffee. I'd take it in an IV if I wasn't petrified of needles!
"'Beauty,' i.e., that which makes something interesting, is related to a mixture of regularity and irregularity. When things are too regular, we usually find them to be uninteresting because they yield no surprises for us. Complementary to this, highly irregular things are often uninteresting because they make no sense. In the middle, between regularity and irregularity, lies a place where things can be understood, but not completely." ~ Title and excerpt from The Computational Beauty of Nature by Gary William Flake.
There is a counter at the window where you can sit and watch people stroll down Main Street or you can choose to sit at the bar which is like no other I've ever seen. The bar stools have multi-colored electric guitars for backs! I wish the pictures were better but the restaurant is dimly lit even in the daytime; the tables are candlelit at night. And of course, the music is an eclectic mix of the many generations of rock 'n' roll.
In the wake of that further affirmation of what seemed like a national death wish, I sat down and wrote the following:
The work I've done with reiki informs my intuitive readings, and flows through my drum circles.
“While many motorcyclists will continue to wear helmets, those who choose not to deserve the latitude to make their own informed judgments as long as they meet the requirements of this new law,” Snyder said in a statement.
Weaving a net of gossamer threads,
Produced by Project 2010. October 2010.
** I love Jane Eyre so any type of retelling/adaptation is going to catch my eye. Plus there are two other books forthcoming in the series where Emma will travel into Nathaniel Hawthorne's The Scarlet Letter and Gaston Leroux's The Phantom of the Opera. Tell me you're not excited about that.
Kiki: What are your reading habits like? For example, how many books do you read on average in a week, what format do you prefer to read in, what time of day do you read, and what setting is ideal for you to get lost in that book?
There was the odd evening last week when I considered lighting the woodburner or putting the heating on. Today I'm sat out in the shade of the garden with the laptop trying not to get burnt! Its been glorious the last couple of days. Beautifully warm and sunny. It can't make its mind up can it?
But no one really explained what it meant to be a grandmother. I didn’t know myself, not until I held baby Blake in my arms. In that moment, I realized that he was one of mine. He belongs to me. He will be on my mind and in my prayers, every day, for the rest of my life. There’s a bond between us that can’t be broken. He has altered my life forevermore.
Neck belongings during one particular wedding ring counters an incredible concoction transitional covers gorgeous honeymoons as well damier goods.
and if we they fly we will run
Hi lovelies. Happy Thursday! 1 more Day and it's the weekend. This weekend is a long weekend for us in Canada, so I'm looking forward to relaxing and some sunshine!
Tara D’Souza
Here, he sits in the hallway, surrounded by toys. He can roll backwards and forwards without hitting his head and/or his face. He has numerous things within reach to play with.
The CJLS, the Conservative Movement's North American halachic authority, voted to endorse two proposals on this issue in December 2006: The decision that ordination of practicing gay and lesbian rabbis is not permitted by Jewish Law (Rabbi Joel Roth,), and the decision permitting the ordination of practicing gay and lesbian rabbis (Rabbi Elliot Dorff and two colleagues).
Moderator: Donna Flayhan (State University of New York at New Paltz)
You're still figuring out your place in the world and how you want your life to shape up.
Dark Horse Perkulator Coffee Dopplebock
2012 started off extremely rough for our family. We began this year with a heartwrenching, tearful goodbye to our sweet Charlie Brown.
This film was problematic in many ways for the producers, and director Gene Kelly – not least because Walter Matthau detested Barbra Streisand, thought she had no talent, and refused to talk to her at all unless the script called for it (he also stopped speaking to co-star Michael Crawford during the filming, after Crawford placed a bet on a horse named Hello Dolly – which won its race – because the name of the horse reminded Matthau of Streisand). No doubt there were some tensions on set, but fortunately it does not come through on the screen.
Here's the site we did our goat butchering. Under the trees with pretty views all around.
4. It takes time.
so I applied a French Chocolate image
I was kind of lazy today, but I did make myself decorate this tumbler. Also I practiced coloring with my Copics and experimented with my PTI seed pack die and stamps. TFL.
My heart started racing…here I am, WITHOUT my MD which I’ve been looking forward to accomplishing in the next 6-8 years…and a friend called ME to ask for medical advice. This friend of mine did however know that in addition to my love for everything medicine, I was certified in Standard First Aid/CPR/AED at the Healthcare Provider Level (HCP) and am in the process of obtaining my Advanced Medical First Responder (AMFR) certification.
here i used the negative of the word to let the bag show through
So, I have picked 5 blogs that I love and that have fewer than 200 followers. All of these ladies are super talented! If you have a few minutes please go take a look at their blog, leave them some love and become a follower!
Suddenly he pulled back. She missed the separation immediately. Her eyes flew open, locking with his, questioning.
These photos are kind of snippets of recent things (some more recent than others) that we've done, including a trip to the Hogle Zoo last weekend; a first for the kids and me!
And that Injera
i hosted Christmas again this year - that's THE holiday i always host - but ended up violently ill - but thankfully i had everything prepared for the main course and my Brother stepped up and saved the day and cooked dinner and dessert - otherwise Christmas was everything it was meant to be and more - my family sharing love, laughter, and smiles in my home - i can't ask for a single thing more!
Peanut Butter Egg - April 5
Cookie Monster drinks his greens and eats cookies.
Anyway, I was especially excited/trepidacious to come across several medical stories on Not Always Right.
entertainment – fruit is – idolatry
I must say that even if I was the only person on the beach, and while I would miss the social experience, I would still enjoy just being clothes free in a natural setting.
Floating over coral in the warm water, I saw an array of colourful schools of fish, like a festival. There’s the fish orchestra – the Trumpet, Drummer and Flutemouth – the arty creatives – the Parrot, Rabbit, Butterfly and Batfish – and the buskers – the Angel, Clown and Surgeon.
Sherry Goshon is one of My doll Idols .. I love her work and could only hope Sherry would give a workshop close to me one Day ..That day Has Come !! Reno / Iowa Retreat held in Snug Harbor , Staten Island NY ..Snug Harbor is a beautiful historical Maritime park and botanical garden that was the perfect backdrop for a creative weekend .
How about going through toys and clothes and donating them to Love INC or a mission in your area.
The guest of honor arrived in a dress that was smaller than the DVDs. Seriously. The back plunged so deeply that we were put in mind of plumbers crouching under sinks. The tightness of the dress screamed "anatomy lesson" more than "fashion statement." Her first question: "Where are all the men?" Kind of makes you wonder whom (or what) she had in mind when she selected her attire for the evening. Doubtless Jane Austen would have a wry and witty assessment.
Atheist: Exactly my point! That is why time is so all important when it comes to things changing into other things. After billions of years anything is possible. I’m telling you one day on a far away land something came out of nothing. I admit that I have no idea how that happened. But I do believe it. It is the only explanation that makes sense the only thing that works with science.
The whole case hinged on the identity of the mystery caller to the chess club. Initially suspicion fell on Wallace himself, as police traced the call to a public telephone just 400 yards from Wallace's house.
## Executing checkinstall script.
However, the Baltic peoples -- as opposed to the Scandinavians -- never seem to have gotten much beyond that stage, I think because it was not necessary for them economically. The only ancient peoples in the Baltic who continued to build primitive boats clear into the modern era were the Livs viz. Livonians (relatives of the Finns) and they used them for fishing.
This morning I slept in, so I didn’t have my normal breakfast at the coffee shop. Instead, I had a cereal bar I had bought in a shop yesterday and a soda from a machine that I found at the building of our morning class today. I really enjoyed sleeping in today, by the way!
Yes, the comfort of country and the reminders of my childhood. Different times. I was very drawn to all of the quilts on offer as well. When I was not quite seven years old, my Mom piled my Sister and I into the car and drove us far out into the country in Ohio to a little red schoolhouse that had been made into a home. The woman living there made quilts for a living and we were both allowed to choose one for the Victorian home that we were soon going to move to in Mason, Michigan. I used mine until it completely and utterly shredded apart. I even kept the shreds for years later. No surprise then that I looked longingly at the slightly torn quilt in the window, especially at only $30!
Someone searched the indra sahasranAma on this site and complained that there was no bAsav. He did not recognise vAsava, one of indra’s names as the one he was looking for. I deleted his rather impolite and belligerent message on fb, because I have never been able to tell anyone from any Indian state that the others are doing it differently and what’s more, the others could be right.
Serve with homemade bread.
Had you bought in in June of 2008 your value would be on June 18, the zenith, $22.702. In 2009 on March 9th, your value would be $11.62. Ouch.
It should be noted that the global warming hoax can be dated to testimony by James Hansen before Congress in 1988 and he is still the GISS administrator! His apocalyptic predictions helped launch a U.S. response currently seen in the Environmental Protection Agency power-grab, based on the false CO2 claims, that will eliminate one fifth of the coal-fired plants providing electricity to a large swath of the nation and likely end the building of new comparable facilities.
So we waited.
It's just....I don't wanna be that person. The crazy with anger person. I really need to believe that, deep down, I'm a good person. And good people don't go around assaulting other people, no matter how much provocation one might have endured.
As we are heading into the Age of Aquarius, new energies are encompassing our bodies and are reflected in various physiological symptoms. Within this transition of the ages, many people will begin to feel many of these energy shift symptoms on a regular basis as our bodies are adjusting and upgrading to the higher frequencies.
a hiding place
Martin Barnett opened the scoring. Having taken a position outside the penalty area from a corner-kick he smashed into the corner. Ben Rowe made it two, out muscling a defender on his way to rolling the ball past the goalkeeper. With his stubble and shaven head, that has now grown long enough to gently comb back, he is beginning to resemble a young version of Popeye's nemesis, Bluto. In the second-half, Sam Schwodler caught Hythe's goalkeeper by surprise by putting the ball through his legs from a tight angle. It was his sixteenth goal of the season. We are still in fourth position in the league and will remain there irrespective of the outcome of our final two games. Not that our manager, Paul Dyke, will allow this to have any bearing on our motivation.
I have to keep this short and sweet (the paintbrush is now calling my name), but please know that I will be back very soon and will be posting more regularly.
One of my favorite war stories is how, during the Battle of the Bulge, the US tanks' top machine guns froze solid and couldn't be fired at the closely advancing enemy. Here it is, Germans breathing down their necks, bullets all around; it's freezing out, guns jammed and what do the machine gunners do? Urinate on them for a quick defrost! See, a German soldier would never think to do that. One needs a certain level of free-flying insanity to win a war, and that's what Patton had, and inspired in his men. To paraphrase Cesar Milan again: Insanity + Discipline, then affection.
Oh, that’s it! I wrote this a few days ago, as usual, and thought, um. Avoiding hurt. Not enough. So-
It really works♡At least for me, I did notice a difference when using this before tanning. Although, the difference doesn't show only after one time.
It's Sunday, we all know what that means. That's right, time for a new challenge. First lets check out last weeks winners. We had some awesome entries last week! A big thank you to all of you that played along with us.
"Jesus, Mick, last time I looked at all this stuff, Raider were right up there - what-the-fuck??"
Now OWS is claiming they shouldn’t be kicked out because each member staying there has not been served with an eviction notice; that only George Weathers had been served.
He won’t falter or stumble! Oh so valiant! So brave!
Sarika is so sexy and beautiful Bangladesh actress . She act is many bangla drama ( Natok ) . For download bangla notok of bangladeshi sexy actress you can search your desired topic .
An article about Gillen and his heritage breed turkeys came out in the Morgan county paper this week. The writing and the pictures are wonderful. This little weekly county paper was voted best weekly in Georgia. I see why.
-Cube of dry yeast, melted in warm water
We moved here in late June last year. And it feels like home. It's been eight months and I'm still not unpacked. But we've signed on for at least two years here so I don't feel the pressure to set up house. That's the trouble with knowing you're not going to stay forever -and not owning. I'm making do.
So why has this story been released? Well we all know that there is the threat of additional taxation on booze and this will undoubtedly be a bad thing for the brewing industry and pub trade - not to mention your pocket and mine - and I don't have a problem with trying to challenge that.
Geisladiskabúð Valda is a small record store focusing mostly on classic rock and heavy metal. At the store you can get CDs, DVDs, records, PC games, etc. But the main focus is heavy music such as heavy metal and death metal. A good store for fans of metal to check out and they'll defiantly find something they like at Geisladiskabúð Valda.
For fast the night approaches
ROMINA CALUSTE and ROB RAYALA: Thank you for everything. I know it gets tiring to listen to me, but you two still do. And I love you both for everything you’ve done for me.
Then we picked up the heart worm meds, paid the bill and headed for home. I looked at the box when I got home and noticed that it wasn’t completely closed. So I opened it and found out that there were only 5 heart worm pills in the box instead of 6. The box said 6, the bill said 6, and there are always 6 in the box.
I decided to get to know Harrington’s talent more, and thankfully he was willing to answer some questions that I asked him:
Is it better to think of someone else or myself first?
ankles and wrists.
Find them in: Fatty cold-water fish such as salmon, pollock, swordfish, tuna, mackerel, and herring contain the two types of omega-3s that the body uses most efficiently: docosahexaenoic acid (DHA) and eicosapentaenoic acid (EPA). Foods such as soybeans, walnuts, and flaxseed also contain omega-3 fatty acids; however, the type called alpha-linoleic acid (ALA) is not as readily available to the body as DHA or EPA. “You’re not going to get high levels of DHA and EPA by eating walnuts or flaxseed because your body can’t metabolize the plant fat as efficiently,” Engler says.
Instead of simply following the currents of the river, we must work towards a “lake economy,” in which we use resources with an eye towards their reuse, maintaining a stock of materials that can constantly re-circulate as long as input and output is efficiently controlled. As an alternative to eliminating computers from society because of the ways in which they use plastic, metals, and energy, why not create technologies that allow for the more painless replacement of parts, so that an upgrade consists of replacing a chip without rendering an entire machine outmoded? Ali asks. It is only through such creative solutions that we may satisfy our need for “treasure” without compromising the needs of the earth.
Yeah! And you probably don't care that this rebellious barnet contains no artificial colour and hasn't been near a comb for days.
I have to find my place in the crowd that follows and surrounds Deleuze. Each individual understands, yet sometimes only stands, in their own way.
Please don't try to tackle all of these skills at once. Build upon what your child already knows and gradually incorporate new information as you go along. These are all skills that can be taught in a fun and stress-free environment! Your child does not have to sit at a desk for 30 minutes a day in order to be successful. (You'll both end up going crazy if you try to do it that way!) Spend a few minutes here and there throughout each day. Capitalize on 'teaching moments' - moments when you can slip in new information, reinforce what you have already been working on, or ask your child to demonstrate what he/she has learned.
These are just some of the thoughts that cross your mind when your hard disk crashes and leaves you a miserable heap of error messages to comfort your soul. You could perhaps calm yourself down if all you lost through this malfunction of evil machinery was illegally downloaded songs and movies but it is really hard to resist punching someone in the brain when you lose a years worth of work through no fault of your own.
Surgeons operating, attendants holding lights, the smell of ether,
The other thing that you may have noticed on my Facebook page is that I have lost my beloved Kindle. I still love paper books but I do love reading on my Kindle. I just didn't realize how attached I've become to it until I lost it. It's been two days since I've seen it. I'm frustrated because Brad and I have literally scoured my house and van looking for it. We've looked everywhere!!! It has disappeared. It can only be explained by rogue house elves or a black hole. The thing is g-o-n-e ... GONE!
No, I won’t miss pulling that wagon around.
Anyhoo, on to my card today.....the theme this month at Sundays With Crissy is HAPPY BIRTHDAY, and I chose this lovely image by Crissy called Love You Sis because I've been wanting to use it for ages. It seems a perfect image to use on a card from one sister or friend to another. Using Paint.Net, I merged it with the fence image (Petals & Palings from Make It Crafty) and coloured it with Copics. The pinks are a little outside of my comfort zone, but I had to justify buying the RV63 and RV66 last year by actually using them at last! And as it turns out, I quite like these shades now as they're not as candy-pink as the lower-numbered Red Violets tend to be.
Add the drained cucumber and onion mixture and return to a boil, stirring frequently.
But that is not really the end of it. Special mentions must also go to The Horrors, Kool and the Gang, Rumer, Hurts and Elbow and a very special mention must go to Jessie J who played her set with a broken foot and provided us with a magic moment. It occurred when she asked for a member of the audience to help her with ‘Price Tag’ and we old cynics cringed. But it turned out to be nothing like the toe-curling moment we expected and a gobsmacked Jessie didn’t quite get what she expected. It put a smile on my face for hours afterwards. Magical.
Tryndamere: Alright, everyone. We’re here to discuss how to make more money.
Then I moved around some of my favorite vintage goodies, and added a bird nest or two… (And notice the canvas I had made of Bubble Boy!)
seeing a man with a mustache evokes a variety of emotions within the beholder and i must admit, i have a bit of a weakness myself for a man with a decorated upper lip. it was my friend's birthday last week and he normally has a very perverted mouth-brow, so i thought this would be a perfect opportunity to make some mustache cupcakes. the party started out at something's fishy, moved on to a mexican themed cocktail party at my friend's house and ended up in a club with three tables adorned with bottles of kettle, veuve, and patron. needless to say this was one of the best nights of my entire life and i think everyone knew it. but back to the cupcakes. i never actually believed that my friends took copious amounts of adderall because they really had attention deficit disorder but after a night of sushi, sake bombing, pinatas, smirnoff icing, and bottle service, it's clear that their minds are all over the place. i figured i would bring the cupcakes to the cocktail party and since it was "mexican themed" a.k.a. they had a pinata, this chola made her classic snickerdoodle cupcakes and called them "churro flavored."
For I have known them all already, known them all--
1 cup sliced almonds
This title holds alot of weight… seriously. It may be bright and gaudy, but the Mirrorball means more than just a big bling-ball for your mantle. Past winners have gone on to catapoult their careers to new heights… you’re almost guaranteed your own show, hosting gig, morning/late night show rounds and a People Magazine cover.
She also assured me that my "plan" from a couple weeks ago is a solid one. I still feel like we're moving at a turtle's pace, but right now I'm at the mercy of my cycle. She did tell me that the Proges.terone cream was likely not going to do anything.** She scolded me for going so long without a full period, so I will make sure I don't let more than 60 days pass going forward. She prescribed a pill for me to take for 10 days to help entice a visit from AF, and also a new rx for prenatal vitamins. I was bummed that the one she gave me last September was on its last refill :( I'm pretty down right now about the whole thing, but I'm hoping some of that is hormone related.
and mix the colours as well...
8 months ago, it was the exact opposite.
The Edmonton campus boasts about 37,000 students and the 55-inch screen is located in their transit hub, which includes a light rail station.
This destruction of all forms of our national identity is engendered by a sense of shame which has been developed and perfected by the ruling elite during the course of the last century. They view all our previous cultural achievements as ‘bad’ or gained immorally at some other nation’s expense. As a result, they wish to eradicate our collective identity and deculturalise us from our roots.
The reception was great. A lovely venue, set up with a gorgeous ambiance. Lots of lovely people there to celebrate with the bride and groom. There was lots of dancing, talking, laughing and eating. The kids had a ball too! They loved the lolly buffet and had loads of fun dancing, with bub(19 months at the time) being the centre of the circle a lot of the time! the party animal danced the night away and didn't crash till we were in the car at about midnight!!!
Aesthetically, there's a lot more going on in the Bradbury, which is a cavalcade of textures and colours and types of type and angles and planes and just areas of interest. Furthermore, as we've established, to a greater or lesser degree the Price and the Ishiguro pander to and play to the stereotypical cover expectations befitting their particular sought-after audience. That's potentially an effective marketing device, but it's also a very boring one. The Bradbury, on the other hand, isn't trying to be like anything else (although it does perhaps owe a debt to, for example, Kurt Schwitters), and as a result seems so much fresher than the other two, despite having a good number of years on them. It also does a better job of reflecting the thing that's the most important thing of all: the words inside the book (almost too literally, one might argue). That clapperboard on the cover, for instance, is a direct reference to an element of the plot of Cuts, concerning the editing of a television programme. That, to me, says more about the novel than a photo of a city says about Samaritan or another, blurrier photo of a girl says about Never Let Me Go. (Although, as I say, I haven't read any of these books yet. I could, as ever, and as is often the case, be wrong.)
A Censored Race War?
I had noticed a park across the street from where we were
Newly revealed game elements include the following:
I've made hundreds of blocks as well as hundreds of quilts from these blocks and these were a major part of my quilts donated for the Victorian bush fire quilt appeal in 2009.
Anja is watched over from above by sun and moon and a kind yellow bird. It is an honour to make an artwork for one so young. I hope Anja grows up with fond memories of the strange little people who brought her horse chestnuts on her first birthday. I hope she remembers them and is kind to them.
Efforts to “be relevant in the political and social engagement that continued in the ’70s, ’80s and ’90s were perhaps latching on to fads that didn’t express the Church’s unique perspective on the world,” he said.
Automatic Kafka is one of many comics to tap into the post-millennial zeitgeist and deliver a frenzied, passionate critique of the junction points between media, superheroes, sex, drugs, war and politics. Like Richard Kelly would later do in film with Southland Tales, writer Joe Casey and artist Ashley Wood mimic the sensory overload and cluttered landscape of modern culture. Wood's art, descended from the Barron Storey/Dave McKean school of sketchy multimedia collage, especially sets the tone, with his frenzied scribblings, bold use of color, and abrupt stylistic shifts. The series — which unfortunately still hasn't been collected to rescue it from oblivion — is a brilliant and scattershot satire centering around a robotic man called Automatic Kafka and his fellow degenerate ex-heroes. Casey's heroes have long ago stopped doing anything remotely heroic, and now instead dedicate themselves to various vices, and to pimping out their celebrity on TV, or as ass-kicking government agents. And they live in a deeply strange world, as reflected by Wood's wild artwork: scorpions deliver cryptic warnings, the panels are surrounded on all sides by commercial advertisements, and a man with a firecracker for a head plots behind the scenes. The apex of his approach comes in the series' third issue, in which the title hero's TV game show is visualized through a manic cluster of slogans and icons threatening to overload and crowd out the actual images of the narrative. It's a smart, funny, provocative, visually stimulating comic that remains very unfairly overlooked.
All in all, Rules of Negotiation was a light and fun read but don't expect fireworks from it. You will be disappointed. It's not exactly not worth your time, but not something to go crazy over either.
Lt. General Paul T. Mikolashek, USA (Ret.)
Rent is due. Alimony is due. Bills needs payin', Pa!
I got to the door and heard the whoop,whoop,whoop of the alarm and realized that was not normal. I hit the OFF button.
Is having to wait necessarily a negative thing? Most of the time, it sure feels like it. However, there are circumstances where waiting can be a positive thing. I'm sure part of it has to do with what we're waiting for. We wait when we are trying to learn new things. After all, learning something new doesn't usually happen over night. Teachers give students "wait time" when answering questions. This allows students time to process information prior to responding, giving them more time to think before someone is chosen to answer the question. Additionally, we wait for the right time to meet someone, to marry, to have children, to change careers, to begin new business ventures and adventures as well. In all these instances, waiting is a positive thing.
Zero Ambition b/w In The Night
In 1977 NBC premiered a made for tv movie called James at 15. Until I went searching through a stack of my movie tie-in books I’d completely forgotten about the series and the young actor Lance Kerwin.
Fred Thompson
“So, you enjoy your little fling.” Isis stressed the latter. “I’ve watched many come and go out of Nigel’s life, but I’m still here.”
Thank you to the lovely followers who have kindly been asking me how the play rehearsals are coming along. I love being involved in theatre productions but they do tend to take over my life a bit!
Rah Cha Chow is an on-again off-again old friend. I started it years ago when I needed a creative outlet and wanted to stay abreast of the world of online communications. I've muddled about with its focus and have gone months without end without posting. Although its intent is personal and creative -- I have never sold advertising -- it has netted me some cool opportunities.
After about 10 minutes, reduce heat to super low, add the chopped thyme and cook for about 30 to 40 minutes or till the onions wilt and turn a light brown (very imp.) in colour. Keep stirring in between to prevent the onion from sticking to the bottom. Caramelising the onions on low heat is the trick towards getting the perfect onion soup. You technically do this over a period of 3 hours (but as we all know, that long for the onions to caramelise is just not worth the effort, especially for a sick husband whose taste buds are all screwed up anyway).
454310 Fuel dealers
The world I am describing is not a democratic one. It is an autocracy. And the chief beneficiary of those limited rights advocated in all of the rhetoric I have outlined above is the media itself: an all-powerful force, beyond any scrutiny outside of its own gaze, with a first principle right to everyone's thoughts and words and against which no one might protest, and certainly about which no one might have an independent opinion.
If you need help, ask the right person, if you need more time, get up early tomorrow. Whatever works for you than commit to it and do it.
And I stumbled as blind, with contempt for the day
He was speaking at a seminar to enhance engagement with youths on Thursday.
- Not thinking about school when I don't have to
The time and effort saved here is something to really think about.
How do you feel about yourself? What messages are you giving your kids through example?
If you cross the Chinese Border illegally you may never be heard from again.
There are certain people that you really look forward to speaking with – and maybe you never considered it before, but it may be that the reason you look forward to speaking with them, is simply because they are excellent listeners.
Palo Alto Power surge, raises questions about Smart Meters, “a good example of how sometimes the old way is the good way”.“Mindy Spatt, communications director for The Utility Reform Network (TURN), said the utility-consumer advocacy group received many complaints about surges damaging appliances when the SmartMeters were first installed. In the best-case scenario, the event in East Palo Alto is an additional cause for concern, she said.”
Some other thoughts I had regarding the Royal Wedding go thusly:
or feel the burning sand.
“I’ve kind of always wanted to and my dad has too,” Gawdin said. “He kind of said it will toughen me up. It will definately be a new experience and I’m looking forward to it.”
The building still attracts interest from people who think it would be great to live there. But Robert Doyle inspired me to imagine a different future for this building.
This is serious business! (And pay no attention to those voices behind the camera!)
My analysis with is Congress, listen up and pay attention. Politics as usual is O V E R!
The size of the piece is appropriate, this isn't a throw quilt! and I like how she has displayed it on the wall as art. You can check out Pamela's other designs on her Etsy page, or get inspired and make your own Marie Antoinette themed items at home!
So if you ever get a chance to visit Orlando, make sure you visit Discovery Cove, because it is really such an experience and is worth every penny!!! I'd forgo every park in the area to visit this place everyday!
I wil be back soon!
07. Tuneup Meltdown
And seemingly the biggest one:
Which shower curtain do you like better, try to picture the greige walls!
This is the second in a two parter about my trek down the Chattahoochee in 1972, with my high school friends, so if you didn't read the first one, you might wanna. Or not. :)
He said people are simply claiming what is theirs and that if Roodt claims it is his property then he must produce the title deeds.
ok, so it hasn't been perfect, but the most I've gotten behind is like 2 weeks.
A – Para 27.11 – “…the entirely erroneous addition of $10,000,000…”
A couple of weeks ago I had an interesting coversation with Michael over breakfast. Actually, he was eating and I was getting stuff ready for school! So this conversation totally caught me off guard.
After discussing my soft stools (thanks, Mom, SO embarrassing), and the few accidents I’ve had around the house, the vet believes the stool issue is due to my tummy not fully adjusting to the insulin and the new diet, so she gave my mom these pro-biotics called FortiFlora. They will make my tummy better and make me more “regular.” Mom put some on my breakfast this morning and it was pretty tasty. Sammy tried to get some, as she always does when there’s something new, and I swatted her.
The door burst open as Xu Guan dropped to the ground.
Saber Lawrence wants to help his country but is conflicted when he finds himself by Victoria once again. He knows he wants her and takes her not only to see if the passion is still there but to keep her hidden from his enemies.
Come back next week when Amber and I review two SyFy dramas – Amber revisits the soon to end series, Eureka, and I take a look at the Canadian hit picked up by US television, Lost Girl.
Hi from us all here on Paperplay Challenges - 15 days to Christmas Day!
Shisha, over sized chairs, and laidback tunes are what it is all about throughout the week, and once the weekend comes around it’s an electric playground for party people and attractive socialites, with both local and international guests attending.
I always had a spiritual focus in life since I was a teenager, but now I dived more deeply into my heart, my inner Self. I needed to find meaning in the pain I was feeling. I wanted to use my experiences as a mother to grow as a human. And I wanted to try to help others. My work as a writer dried up (the internet is a capricious beast) and I was faced with trying to make a living from my spiritual life. I have gifts to share. I have made mistakes. I have learned from my experiences. I am still learning in each moment. My life and the compassion I have learned through living it can help others, and that is what I offer as a spiritual advisor: I help people listen to their heart. I help bad mothers become better mothers through listening to their heart.
Because it SUCKS! and it crushes your heart.
Cultural rape shame in the region is EXTREME (both islamic, and christian), and it will almost certainly never be acknowledged in local sources, or by Ossetians.This is a cultural pathology very familiar to those who know islamic culture, and balkan and transcaucasian culture; but is really not well understood here in the United States (not that rape shame isn't a huge problem here as well, it's simply an entirely different order of magnitude).
Level 1: MP Cost: 24, Damage: 286%, Attacks up to 6 enemies.
I had to pick myself up off the floor after laughing so hard. Do I ever have a bad idea – oh yeah. About 10 times a day. And you know why? I don’t know of any way to get to the good ideas without going through a whole lot of bad ones. If you are waiting to share or experiment with an idea until you have a perfect one, chances are strong that 10 years from now you’ll still be waiting.
I would have to disagree with the fact that AA “should be respected” because AGAIN, she’s frank, feisty and kalog in talk shows. Weh? Niloloko niyo ba ako? It’s like everyone’s choosing her for humanity’s sake. S’yempre, sino bang may gustong pumatol sa isang SEX TOY na pwedeng gawing dildo/vibrator?
June 15th 2012
Me: "Where are you?"
“It caused a lot of hurt and a lot of pain in the community. I’ve gotten more phone calls about this than I have about any issues in the past three or four years. It wasn’t just elderly people, it was young people, across the board.”
ANYWAYS. The point. She asked me when I had my lapband surgery.
I ended up laying in bed with him, he said he was sorry for being bad choices and he was sorry for not cuddling bugging me anymore. I let him know that he was not in trouble, but we needed to fix the bad choices. I told him I loved him and I loved cuddling bugging with him. Then he told me he was no longer special, because he was bad choices.
Elemental Technologies is the leading supplier of video solutions for multiscreen content delivery.
About the title of this post--yesterday my scheduled workout was High & Tight and Tummy Tuck. Well I did Tummy Tuck, then popped in the other DVD that High & Tight is on. And my computer is stupid and refused to recognize the DVD. WTF? I don't know what's wrong, but my TV is also on the fritz right now (getting that checked out tonight) so I didn't have a way to play the other part of my workout. I was really frustrated but then remembered that there were these cards that came with the program that have exercise moves on them. When I saw them I remember thinking, When am I ever gonna use these? but they actually really came in handy because there were 12 different moves, all from the various workouts, and it told me how many reps to do of each move. So, I turned on some Enrique Iglesias music (oh yeah) and did two circuits of the 12 moves. It wasn't the same as doing the DVD, but it was about the same length of time, my legs and butt felt it, and I sweated, so I figure, good enough! I'll be damned if I'm gonna let my stupid electronics make me miss a workout. So the next time you're facing something that might cause you to miss your workout, just figure out a way to make it work. If you wake up late, fit it in later that night. If the weather's bad and you usually do stuff outside, go to the gym, or do an exercise DVD. If your DVD player stops working, do what you remember or just find another routine you can do without a DVD. There's always a way that you can make sure you're getting exercise in your day. Don't let convenient excuses ruin that for you.
Nassim Gate Visitor Centre. 9am – 6pm. Free Admission.
The body and soul shining from you
Here's a close up of the left hand page. The bottom right part of the page is the typed summary of the week. As an accent on that panel I just stamped the days of the week down the left hand side. I added some hand written journalling to my photos using journal stamps and red ink.
Frogs go through a drastic change in their lives, from tadpole to frog. Seeing frogs everywhere, either from pictures, or out in nature, might be a sign that a big change is coming near.
The early church so shocked society because it declared a peasant labourer- bastard child- turned travelling Rabbi as the Son of God (a title reserved for the Emperor), his radical teachings of inclusion and justice challenged the world, shook the very foundations of the world if you will… yet in the church today we have forgotten this… we have made the son of God once again the state.
Each chunk of land here is divided into files by the origanal surveys ours falls into the Robert Conn survey and you can dig through the file which is a collection of maps, photos, field notes, legal documents, etcs. One survey from the sixties clearly showed how the land was originally divided and made the problem clear. A piece of our land had not been properly accounted for, but not the piece they tried to add. The good news for us is that since they can't tax us twice on the same piece we get a break this year, but have to file to have the newly added section classified as agricultural timber land. What a pain in the @$$.
Should all the energy behind “pro-choice”
- Nicholas Sparks
asked the Secretary of State for Foreign Affairs whether he is aware that, consequent upon the hasty departure of Maltese colonists from Tripoli, the property which they were compelled to leave behind was pillaged by Arabs and that the harvests of the Maltese have been reaped by natives.
“Oh no he found me!”
Of course there is a third for my blog, and it is you!! The fact that you are part of it as a reader! Thank you! Without each and every one of you, my blog would have no meaning or purpose!
Saturday-woke up a little early to drag the groom, my friend Ryan, down to the gym to alleviate any wedding day jitters! Workout consisted of a 30 minute circuit lift followed by running a 6:45 minute mile on the treadmill!!
Krassimir Simeonov, 43, residing in Canada, was convicted of marriage fraud charges in November 2007 and served 15 months in federal prison. He and his co-conspirator wife, Mariana Simeonov, were the masterminds behind a marriage fraud scheme that started in 1997 and ended April 24, 2007 with their federal indictment in South Carolina. Following his conviction, ICE attorneys filed a petition in U.S. District Court, Northern District of Georgia, to revoke his fraudulently obtained citizenship. U.S. District Judge Horace T. Ward revoked Simeonov’s U.S. citizenship.
It's an easy one...you can find the training schedule here. "Run" is a very strong word for me. Quick walk. Or trot. Or...well, I have to do it under the cover of darkness because I don't want anyone to see me.
Barack Hussein Obama represented change in every way. He couldn’t have appeared more different than George W. Bush, or the any of the Republicans, physically or ideologically. He was the first black nominee for either party, and the first truly serious black contender for the White House. It didn’t seem to matter to the American people that he was inexperienced and untested. He ran on a platform of Hope and Change, a brilliant campaign stroke at a time when America was hungry for hope and desperate for change. He was a charismatic orator, and a tireless campaigner, and the financial crisis couldn’t have come at a better time for Barack Hussein Obama.
Archaeology
Now, in today’s world, an architect or handyman is usually selected on the virtue of his license, his experience, his skill, and his training. But having the wisdom of God is not usually a requirement.
And now, on that ever so charming note - photos!
John Nash’s tragic recollection of a battle in which out of 80 men, 68 of his fellow soldiers were killed within minutes. He depicts the men climbing out of the trench and walking tiredly to their deaths. Without any heroics or exaggeration, Nash has harrowingly illustrated the sadness and waste of war.
Iwan
El Coco ~ Cocomotion ~ AVI ~ 1977
I suppose understanding is always a relative affair.
but climbs over elsewhere is a thief and a robber.
All of his life, one of his greatest problems would be the tempestuous emotions that threatened to swamp him at important junctures. Finally, desperate to escape his own thoughts and feelings, he sought escape in his ancient refuge, a French anthology of romance tales. One of the stories reminded him of his present dilemma. It was the tale of two teenaged lovers, separated by cruel Fate. The plot was good, but the story was unsatisfying as it was told. It was way too short, for one thing. A good story demanded a full, well-dramatised telling. He shared his opinion with Rutland.
You do NOT have to comment on every blog, BUT if you do, you will just have more chances to win!
Will wait to let it heal, with kindness!
There are parts of me that are static and there are parts of me that are subject to change and probably will be in flux. But I also need to accept the things I cannot change. So I might go ahead and say what those are.
Thunder On The Mountain
4.Transfer the flour mixture to a medium mixing bowl and stir in the cooled oats and the apricots. Fold in the milk mixture using a rubber spatula until large clumps form. Gently knead the mixture in the bowl with your hands until the dough forms a cohesive mass.
I hiked without a break. 2 km before the top you can see the Kesch-Hütte. The 1350 m height are spread on a distance of 13.9 km, and it took me 2:25 hours for that part alone.
It is very essential to check the variety of dishes on the menu before you choose a caterer. Some caterers are specialists in particular dishes whereas the others are not. A thorough research will help you tremendously in arranging the most delicious food for your honoured guests.
I felt fat, ugly, and self-conscious, especially since L'Ailee's always been very athletic and never had a problem with her weight or complexion. Her flaws were all worn on the inside. She was going to see me naked. I insisted on doing it in the dark, nevermind that she had a really good idea of what I looked like under my too-loose clothes and liked it just fine.
Draft guidelines for telling transcendent stories: Installment number one
Oh, the wolf said, “ That’s right, brother. I’ll give it to you.” Because, of course, he was a brother of the animals. So wolverine tried it and the damn thing exploded. “Oh,” wolf said, “ You’re alright, brother. As long as you don’t just play with what I gave you.”
But this is why I’m taking Occupy Wall Street — or, perhaps more specifically, the ‘We Are The 99 Percent’ movement — seriously. There are a lot of people who are getting an unusually raw deal right now. There is a small group of people who are getting an unusually good deal right now. That doesn’t sound to me like a stable equilibrium.
I am thinking moss.
6. Writing this blog at times...haha
Let's face it, people. We really don't know what any of this stuff is.
“I do the cooking,” Tupper reminded. Without a trace of artifice, he smoothly added, “I’ll eat enough tonight if you hunt for us.”
Texas officials say they can’t obey a court order forcing them to move more than 150 mentally incompetent prisoners to psychiatric hospitals by June 1 because they don’t have enough space, staff or money to do so, reports the Austin American-Statesman. The Texas attorney general’s office has asked District Judge Orlinda Naranjo to review her January decision forcing the Department of State Health Services to start moving all current “forensic commitments” to state psychiatric hospitals. All such prisoners who arrive after June 1 would have to be moved to a psychiatric hospital within 21 days of a judge’s order.
Our destination is still less than 50 nautical miles away, and technically we will be within the same set of islands (Grenada, Carriacou and Petite Martinique), but it will be our first sail as a couple alone, our first departure from land as liveaboard cruisers, and a chance to learn anew, the face of a new land. We will also be sailing in tandem with another Cat and a great couple of seasoned sailors we met in Grenada.
In real news we’re a bit thin on the ground. Gro Harlem Brundtland becomes Prime Minister of Norway, while Wojciech Jaruzelski becomes Prime Minister of Poland and immediately begins trying to find an excuse to impose martial law. And the Stardust Fire happens in Dublin, killing 48 and teaching everyone an important lesson about not locking the fire exits that continues to periodically and fatally be ignored. On a related note, 21 people die in the Karaiskakis Stadium disaster in Greece, likely because of a failure to open an exit gate enough.
I will introduce the Beach and Sea creatures theme in a weeks time after all our St Georges Day fun and after Little "E" and Little "L" get back form their holiday.
So there I was, minding my own business. Peacefully lying on the couch with a flame shooting out of my ear (ear candling - it's amazing). Ava chose that moment to say what quite possibly is the funniest thing she has EVER said...well this week anyway. Now, Ava rambles. She asks me at least 500 questions a day. I think she says "mom" or "mama" at least 1000 times a day. Around 8 or so if she hasn't met her quota, she usually starts saying it 5 or 6 times in a row before asking or telling me what is weighing on her little 4 year old mind. But, I digress. As I was lying with a candle stuck in my ear...Jill sitting next to me to ensure that my hair did not catch on fire (or the couch for that matter), Ava was in the midst if a litany of questions and observations. Thrown in was, "Mom, where's your fivehead?" Of course, I was confused. "Huh?" She then pats the top of her head and says, "Is this my fivehead?" Still confused, "Huh??" She explains, "Well, this is your fourhead...." (pointing, of course, to her forehead.) Unfortunately, I was unable to laugh very hard at that point because: (1) I try not to laugh at her because I don't want to embarrass her and make her not want to come to me with her questions and (2) I was afraid that if my head was shaking, my hair would catch on fire.
The kids in the mess that Seamus left for us.
Founders Kentucky Breakfast Stout
I couldn’t stop laughing, which probably assisted with the calorie burn.
Add flour mixture, a little at a time, until mixed well.
subdues a Vulcan, chained and black.
RESOLVED to ADOPT and APPROVE, as it is hereby ADOPTED and APPROVED, the Report and Recommendation of the Investigating Commissioner of the above-entitled case, herein made part of this Resolution as Annex “A”; and, finding the recommendation fully supported by the evidence on record and the applicable laws and rules, and considering the almost four years of inaction that caused delay in the disposition of the cases, Atty. Enrique S. Empleo is hereby REPRIMANDED and repetition of the same act shall be dealt with accordingly.
So all this was buzzing around my head when we sat down to a free dinner in the National Brewery Centre last week. Master Brewer Steve Wellington had chosen a beer to go with each of the three courses we were served, and he stood up to introduce and explain each match.
This is gonna' be fun.
Well, a couple years ago when I came home from Black Friday shopping, my hubby is like, "Why can't we just have Christmas now? Why wait? You're gonna make the kids wait until half their winter break is over to get their toys. If they got them now, since you're done shopping, they can have the entire two weeks to play with their new stuff." I agreed with much of his logic. However, my argument was, it loses the 'Christmas feel' if we opened gifts now. And, come Christmas, they wouldn't have anything to open, and would feel disappointed. They wouldn't understand they had Christmas early. So, we thought about it. We also talked about how the gifts often go forgotten because they got so many. Thats when we decided to do the "Twelve days of Christmas". Even though I am aware that the Twelve days of Christmas is actually AFTER Christmas, we chose to have the kids open one gift for twelve days leading up to Christmas (sort of like Hanukkah). This way, they had time to play with their toys, they wouldn't get overwhelmed, and the Christmas spirit would be alive for almost two whole weeks.
***Next Challenge is "Fair".
or with a big group of friends...
This Kat has been waiting for months in anticipation for the ruling in the extradition proceedings involving Richard O'Dwyer. As readers of this weblog may recall, Mr O'Dwyer hosted the website TVShack.net, which provided links to unauthorised copies of films and TV shows which visitors could then chose to download (see previous Kat post here). Mr O'Dwyer, arrested on 23 May 2011, was accused of conspiracy to commit copyright infringement and of criminal copyright infringement. He was later released on conditional bail.
First, I import my paper into Microsoft Word.
I also let myself sleep in so I didn't start running until after noon. The air temperature was great but DAMN it was humid. I was dripping sweat because it just wasn't evaporating at all. I began to think I should have just gone running as soon as the dogs woke me up bright and early instead of going back to bed.
While they fossicked outside, I set about preparing the dough for a loaf of bread. Bread is the most incredibly simple yet rewarding thing to make, and while I set the dough aside to proof (rise) I went back outside to mother over the chickens. I cleaned out their coop (hurrah! Another egg!) and shovelled their waste and straw bedding into the compost heap, turning over the top of the pile to start up the microbes with a little oxygen. I relined the coop with more straw and went back inside to finish unpacking. Lo and behold, in my mailbox was a delivery from Diggers Club! Garlic cloves for my yet to be built vegie patch – I was almost as excited about these as discovering another freshly laid egg. These are now set aside and work will start on a patch this weekend.
Oct 19 – Beaumont Club – Kansas City, MO (W/Cobra Starship)
"Jesus!" The Widow Johnson exclaimed in fright at the sound. The class erupted into laughter.
Daughter winged it back to Wellington later that afternoon then tweeted us with a message. “I’ll be returning to Christchurch soon with a group of friends. Can we borrow a car to go off to Hanmer for two nights?”
Kedah Royalty lodges report over enactment amendment – Monday, 23 April 2012 14:03
Much like the US EPA, India's MoES has implemented various policies and programs relating to conservation of the country's natural resources, its biodiversity and "ensuring the welfare of animals, and the prevention and abatement of pollution."
We live our lives based solely on what our emotions tell us to do. As emotions are far more potent than any rational thought we have in our brains, they drown out any notion of reasonable thinking that we may possess. You suddenly have what you think is an amazing idea, one that is fuelled purely by some great big green spurt of emotion that explodes in your head like a firecracker, and your sensible side is going “Hang on a mo, are we sure about this?”, but you naturally, of course, choose to ignore it. Sensible sucks. Emotions rule. So your rational side is left by the wayside, waving its arms in the air and trying to get your attention but failing miserably, like someone with a sore throat who is shouting at you the middle of a tornado, you just don’t hear them as it’s far too faint. And by then it’s way too late anyway. That great idea you had, in the cold light of day, not looking so great now, is it? Yep, you screwed up again.
Many now feel that for the Ordinariate to achieve its objectives, including financial security, it needs to find itself a permanent base – an ecclesiastical and administrative headquarters. It is often the case that people feel more comfortable in parting with their money only when they can see that there is a specific place it is going to. Currently, the Ordinary is based in an office at the Bishops’ Conference, whilst, as yet, no provision has been made for a specific Ordinariate church – a kind of ‘cathedra-less’ cathedral for the Ordinary. Now that Pope Benedict XVI has led by example - once more - in his generosity to the Ordinariate, it may even be possible that one or two bishops in England and Wales may also find it in their hearts to offer this infant structure some further assistance, such as a church building?
Me: Thank you, Andrew!
“Your kind has nothing to say to me.” She eyed him suspiciously, deciding on her course of action.
I love him. Don't get me wrong. But he has a definite and identifiable design aesthetic.
The authority was given to all those around the Globe who are holding workshops of teaching or initiating, etc. It does not Matter what they are doing as long as they are light workers.
I hope everyone had a good festive season. Mine was reasonably quiet as mine usually are. No New Year's resolutions this time around; I figured I have enough to be getting on with this year already!
next Spring, and then I can share more of it with you.
She is eleven.
Don’t expect the restaurant to somehow chill your wine in a short amount of time. Consider chilling your wine to a lower temperature than you would normally drink it, as it will probably warm up some during transport to the restaurant.
Let’s just refer to this as design mash-up, noting that it does work best when following a few key principles.
We have officially been moved into our house for almost a month. It has been amazing, but A LOT of work at the same time. When I come home it is still hard to believe that it is our "home," and that we don't have to leave. We are so very thankful that we got to move into the house and start working on many of the jobs before the baby comes.
Happy Tuesday! I would like to introduce you to my new business venture The Closet by Glow Kouture! I have so many clothes in my closet and where the Hubby and I moved to, my walk-in closet is much smaller than the one I had before. So I've decided to perform a closet clean out and clear out some things! Hopefully, there's someone out there who wants to buy some gently used brand name clothing and accessories! =)
An important to your mlm accomplishment is usually to establish a plan and stick to it. The hours that you can devote for your organization, even if it is a couple of several hours on Sunday or Sunday, are vital to your success. Create a timetable, jot it down, and without exception, stay with it.
vic davalillo
They will also get a 100 per cent increase in the cost of living allowance (Cola).
The only person who knows my living hell is Greg and he's been good about keeping my secret. I'm only telling you now because it troubles me when I see new writers agonize over a review or a beta-reader's critique.
By the summer of 1975, I had found myself at a place in my life where the road into my future was diverging toward uncertainties and I was faced with having to make a decision about what I was going to do next with my life. Three of my friends and I had just been ousted from a beautiful mountain cabin we had been sharing and living in for the previous four months. Now I was suddenly back living at home with my parents at age twenty-four.
- I moved out to state. Utah to Las Vegas! An awesome, scary, wonderful choice! -
I’ve always known that my parents, grandparents and great-grandparents all hail from the Sunderland and Durham areas on the north east coast. And over the last couple of years I’ve been going through the on-line censuses, gathering names and dates as well as seeking out old photographs.
It's original and you have the pride or your own creation.
“It needs a whole lot more than that,” Bruce mumbled under his breath. Louder, he argued, “I don’t think it would be so hard to strip it,” as he scraped at the peeling paint with his chisel, sending little chips flying toward me and raining down on my head. He wiped away the paint dust with his hand. “See,” he said, “not hard at all.”
I am so excited to be hosting my first giveaway blog hop. I’m joined by my friend Anitra from The MamaZone and we hope you’ll join us as we host the Christmas Treasure Train Giveaway Hop and Treasure Hunt.
Preheat griddle pan over med low heat.
(Sorry!)
golden
Reflective Vests for Uninsured Bikers - $20
As little girls they love Jesus because we love Jesus. But as they grow, I pray that they will love Jesus on their own. I think it's important for them to see what Jesus has done for them and then for them to choose to follow Him because they desire to....not just because Mommy and Daddy do. Only then will they develop their own personal relationship with God....
It’s a smaller, specialized museum that doesn’t get the high traffic of the more famous ones. I was able to linger at the dioramas, exhibits of beryls, turquoise, jade, gems. I marveled at the Japanese netsukes that are miniature sculptures of animals and people or Indian elephant adorned in silver and stones.
Although the aluminum upright can barely be seen beneath the brake ducts, the key function of the upright is joins the hub to the suspension. F1 does not use adjustable suspension in the same way as many racecars. That is with threaded adjusters, but instead solid suspension links are mounted the hard points with shims. These shims are used to alter the camber, ride height, pushrod offset and castor.
In addition, Nokia Siemens Networks is expanding its data devices portfolio with three new 4G data devices which help operators deliver mass market mobile broadband profitably and quickly.
Kuya Ulz – I will miss you, you know that. Thanks for everything my friend.
The thread is by Lizbeth, with 6 little clear blue beads on each motif. The pattern is like many out there: a simple circle of rings. Stainless steel earwires of course! I'm skeptical of anything else.
An atheist heart has casted me out
29. Invisible Target
8:30 – 30 Rock (NBC): Angie launches her new fashion line, which brings her reality show’s intrusive cameras back to “TGS.” Yet Angie’s show ends up focusing on dramas swirling around Jack, as he receives news about his wife and then faces his feelings for Diana. Another Queen of Jordan episode? That’s disappointing. Who does that?
Peer Associates
Chocolate frosting
I had to literally pull my wife away from the prairie dogs. I see giant rats, she sees cute furry squirrel things to play with and kiss. But it was neat how, driving through the refuge, you suddenly roll right through their town. They scamper across the road, walk right up to you, call to one another from hole to hole, dart in and out of holes, peek their heads out like womp-a-moles at the arcade....
The bottom paper was a section from Tims new Kraft paper pad. This pad is lovely as it has already embossed sections on it that act as a resist when applying colour to the paper.
But this what I excel at.
So I had to rush this morning to go to my dorm and pick up the file and rush to the school to meet my friend at our scheduled time, but I arrived so late, that I missed her because she had an other appointment to attend to, and she just left when I finally arrived there… she only told me about that other appointment when it’s already too late for me to do something about that, but it’s okay, it’s not like she’s one of the friends whom I can’t meet regularly, we’re actually meeting again on Saturday for our regular review class.
a mandelbrott of sheer simplicity i shall become
2. Wear orchids – For an elegant up-do, you can take a few white Cymbidium blooms and pin them in your hair. They are an eye catching add on to any look. With the vast selection of different orchids and colors, the options are endless.
And there he stands: rebellious . . . unrepentant . . . un-forgiven . . . destined to undergo further discipline. Discipline not only for disobedience, but for a defiant spirit; for an act of unkindness; for pretending a lie is the truth. . . when forgiveness and restoration could be his immediate reward.
I once met a theologian who was extremely pious, but who had the habit of speaking to the (secular) people around him in a very blunt manner; his method penetrated so deeply that it shook them very severely.
My friend S and I went to the Asian grocery store again on the weekend and had fun tasting all the food samples. They had a lot of (salty yet delicious) noodles and dumplings this week. I noticed a Natrel brand dark chocolate milk and forgot to buy a carton to take home. I took this photo of their salad bar for you, something different:
One of the reasons for going to Amsterdam was to buy records. We managed to find several record shops in Amsterdam, and in Rotterdam on the way home. In the days before the internet, this involved literally pacing the streets of the city centre, asking about and generally being lucky enough to find a shop selling the latest in European techno.
The dungeons and caverns beneath Harrow Home draw inspiration from gothic horror and place it in the early modern setting. Source materials would include the tales of Edgar Allen Poe, Lovecraft's story "The Festival", and the classic black and white horror films of the 1930's. The byzantine politics and tortuous relationships of the wizards living beneath Harrow Home recall classic D&D adventures like Castle Amber, Tegel Manor, or Mervyn Peake's excellent novel, Gormenghast. I might even watch Clive Barker's Nightbreed again.
Love the colours even if the card look fallish. lol I made for a friend that I haven't seen in while but for good excuses ... she recently had a beautiful baby boy at the beginning of the year! So just a simple hello card to let her know I'm thinking of her.
Real or artificial, I love stuffing a tree with branches. This year the branches were artificial, but you can use real greens and berries, too. A favorite trick if you are using an artificial tree and miss the smell of pine, is to plug the tree with real pine branches or eucalyptus leaves. Either will create a beautiful smell in the house - much better than those pine-scented plug-in air fresheners. Here I've started with some artificial berries and red hydrangea flowers from Michael's.
But (as my last post suggests) I’m ready. I made my own syllabus for the summer and I am loving working it. Something has shifted in me. Am I just that much more mature? Secure?
In addition to using drones for surveillance and intelligence purposes, increasingly the U.S. military and the C.I.A. are using drones controlled via satellite communication to launch missiles and bombs on population centres indiscriminately, often at distances of many thousands of miles. The outcomes of these terror strikes are countless massacres of innocent civilians. These atrocities are ignored by the capitalist media and major Western “humanitarian” organisations that provide a formidable cover-up for U.S. crimes.
So nowadays we live in an abnormal faith environment — Sunday-go-to-meeting, doctrine over lifestyle, lethargic liturgy rather than fiery faith. Meanwhile the handbook for anointed action and advancement surrounds us, buried in the Bibles that abound in our country.
When I think of all the harm the Bible has done, I despair of ever writing anything to equal it.” — Oscar Wilde
So the majority of the time on my trip was spent between lying on the couch and lying on the inflatable air mattress, wanting to die.
On my part, I think I am a lot more relaxed than last year. I'm still a person that thrives on a schedule, so I do make daily and weekly ones. The difference is, that this year, I don't get (as) frustrated when we can't keep on track. In fact, I've come to expect it. I also put more wiggle room in our plan to accommodate disruptions and to allow for added time on discussions that take us onto interesting tangents.
I have read the memo, and Shapiro's analysis a dozen times. Each time I've read them I have had the same reoccurring thoughts. Having been a executive I tried to put myself in that frame of mind and asked myself how I would have handled the situation. Here is what I came up with.
Please do the a world a favor, and share this with your friends. This information changes everything, right? Trust me. The next time you purchase some Sprinkles Cupcakes, please do the honor and eat them correctly. You will have less mess, more fun, and above all, the knowledge that you did something right.
Sunday: Church, 10:00-12:00, Church Youth 4:00-7:00 (sometimes), and Christmas Vesper rehearsals, Sept-Dec., 4:00-6:00
"Oh yeah! I don't know him... or his dog though!"
As I was typing that, I remembered that we have this wonderful thing called Wikipedia. Surely there’s a wiki for this? There has to be! And I bet all these quotes have been collected by someone. I dare not go in there now though, I’ll probably spoil myself.
Me: "Yes, there was a Sarah in the Bible."
Care of his Mother,
the parents were cheering...It was a riotous sound!
Pour cup of tea from thermos and consider blank screen.
People always warn to be very careful of the horses here. They walk freely between the game and is believed to be descendants of the farm horses that was kept here many years ago when the area was still a farm that belonged to the Marais family. Yesterday however, the horses were very friendly, asking for a scratch before I crossed the bridge. :)
I look for key indicators. I look for smiles and engagement in what they're doing. I listen for new words or ideas. I watch the way they play. I listen to the questions they ask. I consider the way they solve problems. I ask questions, and I listen to answers. I enjoy the silence as they ponder and play with new concepts. I keep my cool when they explode in frustration. I console them when they fail. I appreciate their attempts, successful or not, at independence. I follow them in new directions.
do you think it wasnt hard for *** too?
Brian at BrianSews made a very informative YouTube video demonstrating the use of a few different template buttonhole attachments. Take a look.
14.0-inch Diagonal High-Definition HP BrightView LED Display (1366 x 768),
The idea is to choose 2 colors on the color wheel that
Carrie Bradshaw. Patricia Field exploited just about every Fashion don’t in the book and made the Sex in The City character a style icon. Take the first photo's fashion don'ts: crop tops and long hair on the over thirties, combining dark on top and light on the bottom, horizontal large stripes on the hips, wearing a bum bag years before they came back into fashion, and yet we probably all swooned.
But this is what disturbs me, especially as this is a Christian Organization: Not one word in the letter about evangelizing those inside Israel, or praying specifically for the lost inside the nation to come to the knowledge of Jesus as the Messiah–or even praying for those living there, who are believers already but are persecuted. Instead the letter starts off with an excerpt from a book written by Mike Evans, ‘Why the Church should support Israel‘:….
7th: no details but bad
As the recent flare-ups in the presidential campaign have shown, America's still pretty messed up when it comes to race. Even though we're not naive enough to think such problems can be fixed by a blog post, we'd like to do our thang to bridge the divide.
I showed him how to flex his arm so that his biceps popped up and he had that “hump.” I showed him the definition of his skinny shoulder, and how he could find his triceps. We talked about how swimming would help define those muscles, and then I had to explain what define meant.
In California we have the Tri-tip, the perfect cut of meat for the BBQ. Everyone should be able to enjoy this cut of meat so I will post information on this in the next couple of days. e of days.
I thought I would ink up an older stamp seeing as they have been sadly neglected lately! So out came the beautiful Miss Claus and she was coloured with the usual DI's, SU's and Nick Bantock inks.
The agreement should stipulate how patent suits against the licensee by third parties will be handled. The licensor may not agree to warrant the validity of the licensed patents and may not assume an obligation to defend or indemnify the licensee against a third party suing the licensee for patent infringement. For the licensee, however, it is important to adequately consider possible infringement. A first negotiating position would be to seek full indemnification from the licensor. If the licensor does not agree to this, it should at least: (a) affirm that to the best of its knowledge, the technology to be transferred is not covered by any other patents and (b) commit itself to joining the licensee in any action to be taken in the event of third-party claims for infringement, including legal action (see the subsection on warranty and indemnification for additional comments).
Bae: I am into scarves and bandanas.
Bearing in mind that whites account for 90% of the population, simple maths suggests that non-whites attack and wound whites at a rate forty-five times higher than whites wound non-whites. This is a truly shocking figure and one that should be of enormous concern to the race relations industry, the government and the media, who purport to be intensely interested in both racial crime and “community cohesion”. However, this appears not to be the case at all.
4) Media protes it
ambulation’s
“Oh it’s probably a friend this time,” said Hermel, thinking wishfully that the Elkron could not be quite that harsh.
I'm not even sure politics would count. The now Prime Minister (as at the moment of writing, possibly at the time you're reading) is 50 on September 29.
VersaMark
When you're making up your guest list think about setting some guidelines for yourself as to where to draw the line: Singles with no guests, only first cousins, no work colleagues. And where to make exceptions: Singles in the bridal party can bring a date, the only single friend in a group of friends can bring a date.
Shatung: Send the fish back. The seals are gone because they have no fish to eat and we need the seals.
VR Goggles- They have something like this each year, but the latest one uses Android 4.0 and can control PC, Console, and Tablets. The thing has hand tracking and 360 degree head tracking with a 3d HD display. I haven't heard a price point yet, but I'm guessing they'll cost around 800 dollars.
Rearview by Mike Delosso
It's all Sandra's fault. She's currently doing posts about her family history and recently did a rather impressive one about an Easter outing, complete with bonnets, in Warley (Halifax) about 1910. The clothes fascinated me and it reminded me of this photo of my mum and grandma. The back of the picture says it dates from 1943 and I think it was taken in Bradford. (The family's home city.)
Of course I didn’t really know it at the time. He was hidden behind a mask and pads and shin guards and about 30 lbs of camouflage that pretty effectively made him look like every other hockey goal tender in the world.
Grace, mercy, and peace, which come from God the Father and from Jesus Christ—the Son of the Father—will continue to be with us who live in truth and love.
Phase 9) Send foreign “AID”
My voice was completely gone after the show because I spent the entire thing screaming as loud as I possibly could. But Katelynn and I still made sure to meet Pink Shirt Guy out in the lobby, where he was chugging another beer. We told him how awesome he was, and he agreed.
If you have read Carson before, I think you will be bored and/or disappointed. He has not given his readers anything different or anything new to think about in this book. I wish he had interacted with some of those he opposes since it would have made the book a better read. He would likely be pleased with that fact, but for his readers there will be much yawning and sleepy eyed skipping ahead to the next page or the next chapter. And that will likely not please him one bit.
Inside his heart there is no light,
They dance, they play, with souls on Halloween.
I’m thinking of Alex Roe’s bravery in putting on such a potentially controversial play in this day and age (his Uncle Tom’s Cabin is on the boards at Metropolitan Playhouse through December 12). But it occurs to me that the tone of Kipling’s line is also more than a little relevant to the cultural product at hand. Both “Gunga Din” and Harriet Beecher Stowe’s novel and its many theatrical adaptations share a point of view we today recognize immediately as patronizing, an attitude not far in spirit from “Good dog!”
"Commonplace" is a translation of the Latin term locus communis which means "a theme or argument of general application", such as a statement of proverbial wisdom. In this original sense, commonplace books were collections of such sayings, such as John Milton's commonplace book. Scholars have expanded this usage to include any manuscript that collects material along a common theme by an individual. Such books were essentially scrapbooks filled with items of every kind: medical recipes, quotes, letters, poems, tables of weights and measures, proverbs, prayers, legal formulas.
‘But I dont have a passport’ – West Bengal stands to lose when it cannot appreciate the importance of that space of mental topography called East Bengal, which also is a real geographical entity. The lamentations for his long-dead mother with her spectral presence in a home he does not and cannot live but is the only place he can ever call home makes the case for the continued presence of the East Bengal in the West Bengal imagination. We do need it for sanity, to avoid a process of loss of parts of oneself. The present project of dropping the ‘West’ would help erase the memory of the grandmother altogether for the next generation, let alone lamenting the inability to return. For the next generation, there is no return may be, to the east. They are all marching to Delhi, to become ‘Indians’, a people without grandparents, but a people with an ‘ancient history’, I am told. In Delhi descend all the cosmopolitans without grandparents and great-grandparents – the first true Indians who are nothing but Indians, and powerful ones at that. Being ‘too’ Bengali or worse still, Lepcha, makes one that bit less suitable for this ‘Indianness’. This Indianness is a sophisticated shoe to fill, and I have smelly feet. Some of that smell comes as an inheritance from people who came from places where they do not even fly the Indian tri-colour.
my little joke.
E and O insurance as provided by host
where insecurity most likely crept in and took root in our hearts.
Dilated! I was dilated at 21 weeks along! How could this happen? And how could I go from a 23 to a zero in cervix length in less than a week?! I felt just fine - I had had no cramping, no contractions, no pushing or clenching feeling in my belly - nothing at all. I felt perfectly normal. How could this be happening?
Mario vs. Donkey Kong 2 may not play in actuality the aloft way the aboriginal bold did, but the new yield on the blueprint is a fun and auspicious one. The touch-screen controls are simple to get a handle on, and with added than 80 altered stages to play through, as able-bodied as the architecture mode, you’ll acquisition yourself with affluence to do. It’s artlessly a abundant time for Mario admirers and addle admirers alike.
“May 22 I had a chance to meet with Todd and Holly Petitt of Africa Bags at their home in Colorado. www.africabags.org We have been talking with them about a pilot fruit-drying project within the next 9 months. Africa Bags has offered us space in one of their community centers (built by funds from the sale of Africa Bags) as soon as we can get ready. Super exciting – we have a lot of work to do and a lot of money to raise.
You love popsicles, ice cream with Magic Shell, homemade mac and cheese, broccoli, salad with blue cheese dressing, Goldfish, chips, and Chipoltle
I design and hand/mouse-draw all of the images that are sold in the Delicious Doodles Shop. Some are cutesie animals, some are sketched flowers, there are a few men's images, some fantasy items and also some 'darker' images featuring Vampires, skulls and Gothic stuff, something for everyone!
Here is a guide to three main Greek political parties which are likely to win seats in the parliament, compiled by Al Jazeera:
Earlier, Bennett was accused of murder in the 2005 slaying of an alleged gang member, 20-year-old Arkeylius Collins. A bystander wounded in the attack, Terrell Rollins, cooperated with prosecutors and agreed to enter a witness protection program.
“I think it’s funny how things come full circle,” he said.
Whether you make cards, scrapbooks, cross stitch, knit, make jewelry or even flower arranging or baking, we want to hear from you!
Yes, flowers are not really necessary, nor are pictures, music, song; yet who would be without them? And if you only do the work which is necessary in a house, for the mere existence of its inmates, you bring about the very thing you are trying to avoid. It would be perfect drudgery then, to work to such an end. It is the little bright touches, the extras, the delicacies, that lift our work up
But it wasn’t all outdoor swimming, flower arranging and jolly dorms. The day started at 6am sharp with a brisk two-mile run and no breakfast (cold porridge, bread and jam) for any stragglers.
My personal experience is that many people, from various races and cultures, don’t really care much about past historical events in this country. They blindly follow the democratic process hoping that it will eventually bring peace and prosperity for all, not realizing that they are being systematically brainwashed on multiple levels of their intellect. Firstly, as stated previously on this blog, democracy in Africa is a farce! It will never create peace for ALL the people for the simply reason that the process is built on deception, falsehoods and cunning propaganda that fits the agenda of the ‘elite’ rulers of the country.
Before entering my current position I will admit I didn't really see the value of Life Insurance. It was a requirement of life to meet the contractual obligation to the mortgage company. Quite frankly it was an extra payment that I could really have done without. (for a little while we even did) We were 20 something with no plans to depart this world and no worries that it might happen against our will. The thought never really crossed my mind what would happen if I did die.What that would look like for those left behind, who would pay for my funeral, how my husband would pay the bills? How long would it be before he would have to be back to work full time?
Central Intelligence Agency. USA external spy group.
All I know is that as soon as I can, I'll be putting this complication behind me by renouncing my US citizenship. It's years in the offing, of course (and who knows - the IRS may never get their act together on this), but who needs these wallet-snatching Americans in their back pocket when all they do with the money is give it to their friends in the large multinationals?
On Independence Day, it is traditional to review what has been accomplished.
The two peas have been busy, needless to say, and the forgotten updates have piled up. This week's update covers a needed vacation from busy school and awesome family time.
exceptionally
Some people ask me, “How could you put a church in Andy’s backyard?” But whose backyard is it? God’s. The church and city don’t belong to Andy or to me or to anybody else.
*coconut water is rich in electrolytes like potassium
I enjoyed hearing the first impressions of my teammates as we arrived in Chiang Mai. "It's a lot different than I expected." "It's more developed than I expected." "This looks like a nice place to vacation." Well I say it looks like a nice place to live! And apparently, I'm not the only one who thinks so! We picked up a stowaway at the train station by the name of Brenden Miller; maybe you know him. He is checking out different ministry opportunities for him and his wife in this part of the world.
DR EVIL: Two of the funniest men in the business there. Back to you Kim. Look lads, leave the cable alone…don’t pull that! sssssssssssssssssssssssss
"My child, you have been given a second chance. A chance to atone for your evil thoughts. But you must do one thing first." The being sighed with a sound similar to that of a hummingbird's wings beating the air.
Tracy, Steven R. (2009-05-19). Mending the Soul: Understanding and Healing Abuse (Kindle Locations 691-704). Zondervan. Kindle Edition.
“We’re thrilled to have the opportunity to offer these scarce patches and letters taken from game-worn jerseys from the 2011 season,” said Mike Payne, Panini America Baseball Brand Manager. “They seemed like a perfect fit for Limited Baseball, and should be a nice surprise. And this is just the start for our partnership with USA Baseball. We also look forward to delivering the first cards of the 2012 USA Baseball National Team later in the year.”
Into the wisdom of the enduring balance
So they set out with him inside the dream,
3/4oz Midori Melon Liqueur
In those days television was not available in all households, and my mother had invited several neighbours in to watch her son, the famous doctor and television star, astound the world.
So who are you?
Even if you don’t see the big picture or the small one .
it’s trapping me
After struggling with the attachment for awhile and getting nowhere fast, we abandoned that model and Ky and I started dicing the pork into tiny pieces.
And sent my spine the coldest chill.
Wash, clean and pat the chicken dry (very dry) with paper towels all over, including the cavity. Rub the butter all over the chicken. With fingertips, gently separate the skin from the meat of the chicken breast and rub some butter under the skin. Rub the seasoning mixture over the chicken and inside the cavity, and push some seasoning mixture under the skin.
Excellent performance; Good screen; 16GB of RAM; Connectivity; Blu-ray drive; Price
After Romana became President of Gallifrey, she opened diplomatic relations with the Sisterhood.
Red wine - about 1/4 to 1/2 cup
I am without any die cutting machines, and feel like I've lost an arm.
“What about side by side with a friend?”
Internally I'm sure the fine minds at See's thought they were being informative. After all, there is that pesky law about nutritional value labeling in California. But intentionally or not, what they were really being was annoying. The last thing anyone eating See's candy wants to know is:
I’d like to pull one out of the bedding, but there’s two different tones of the grey. At first I was going darker because this room gets so much natural light, but now I’m leaning toward a lighter one.
Pantone Executive Director Leatrice Eiseman is quoted as saying that “the colour of the year is chosen thoughtfully with the mood of the country in mind and what people are looking for … world events and the arts are pulse points for those involved in the colour industries.” This is much like fashion forecasters being asked to predict this seasons fashion trends and colours. It sounds like a pretty cool job to have…. I’d probably pick black though, damn architecture firm clouding my fashion-sense.
Unfortunately, many Christians, including preachers, have taken an approach to dealing with homosexuality that has earned them the titles generally bestowed upon those against homosexuality – homophobic, hatemongers, etc. These people shun homosexuals completely, or make pronouncements, supposedly from God, about how God hates them, among other things. What is truly unfortunate about this is that this reputation tends to spread even to Christians who do not feel the same way, and often hinders our ability to reach homosexuals with God’s love. That’s right – as Christians, we are called to love homosexuals (this is not romantic love, but true love), just as we would love anyone else. Loving homosexuals does not mean accepting homosexual practices. On the contrary, true love seeks the best for the one who is loved. True love always involves being truthful, even if it hurts, though that “hurtful” truth can be presented in gentle and respectful ways. This leads us to the two facets of the issue of homosexuality that we need to deal with: the non-Christian homosexual, and the Christian homosexual.
Shelly Lavender, wife of missing and presumed dead famous Hollywood screenwriter Alex Krapp, asks Quinn to investigate what happened to her husband who vanished while biking two years ago. She explains an unknown person sent Krapp’s last cassettes to her; she chose Quinn because she knows the sleuth loved Krapp whom she met when he hired her (see KRAPP’S LAST CASSETTE). Quinn listens to the cassettes until a clue leads to a young female biker Krapp met on the road. Soon the missing person’s case, the strange Bruno calls, Beckman’s homicide investigation, and a Hitler 18 Karat bookmark has Quinn wondering whether she should become a full time writer.
- The body supports and gives meaning to psychological states.
There are no minimum quantities. Many printing options available so feel free to ask any questions.
But, no. I'm dumb. I had absolutely no idea. Apparently he got the ring while I was in Ireland. Went to the jewelry store (a real one... NOT one in a mall) and picked out the diamond himself. I'm a little really excited, not gonna lie. And no, I haven't even THOUGHT of a date yet.
I wrote about the Plame non-scandal scandal at length in The Preface and in a large term paper on “attitude change propaganda”. I am gratified that the Washington Post editors did the right thing in their recent editorial, but the Washington Post was as guilty as anyone else in reporting the lies about this issue and repeated them regularly.
Then those same eyes stare up at me asking,
Can’t we get better wifil or be able to use our sim cards for 4G or 3G.
spoken against this tide.
1 Dieter Moebius & Conny Plank - Conditionierer 4:50
Let me know in the comments. I'm looking to you for guidance!
Three in the morning, every part of my mind is asleep besides the functions that are needed to keep me moving for my work day ahead of me, I did not wake Guy specifically to talk to him but it ended up going:
It has been roughly a year since the Widmers introduced a new concept in its mainline IPA: the Rotator series in which a new recipe would be rolled out every three months or so. We are now in the fourth iteration in the series and it is the most unique IPA they've rolled out yet - the "Spiced IPA."
Time enough to feel his son move. After all, he was due in just under a month.
t's Over
If you think about it, there's a certain irony there. Large volumes, ageing and blending: they were are all important in London Porter brewing until around 1850 or so. The success of Guinness demonstrates that there was still a considerable market for partially-aged beer, even though the process had been largely abandonned by English brewers.
European commission has voted already in favour
I’m so happy!
That means 151.7 million Americans paid nothing in 2009. By comparison, 34.8 million tax filers paid no taxes in 1984.
Hope you're all having a great day! Off to the library for more writing.
we can be excited about all of the new sets that await us in the
or the end of breath like an answering cry,
He could never know the bond between mother and son. He did not regret this, nor would He regret when Agave was cast out of the city, when Thebes’ entire royal family fell to exile and murder. Yet He would not look back upon it with pride.
"During the past week the hop industry has seen two fires in the US. Both were kiln fires at hop growers facilities. In both cases only the kilns were affected and the picking machines were left intact. However the structural damage to the growers' facilities would have to be considered major; and there were some hops lost.
Not only did I survive the Big Sur Marathon, I exceeded my time expectations (four hours) and did it without injuring myself.
If you've just arrived from Shelly then you're in the right place! While you're here, please leave a comment and then add your name to Mr Linky (you need to start at the beginning (click the link to the Cupckae Challenge Blog above)
Next time: The Gentleman will consider a rainbow of polo shirts. See you then!
Here is my response:
Wasn't untill a few weeks latter that I found her, and a few months latter untill I got around to this.. yeah I'm slow and lazy.. I know..
Just announcing that it is bedtime at our house causes a shift in the universe, resulting in a decrease in parental patience, energy and coping skills and an increase in child awake-ness, alertness, and argumentativeness. The formerly tired child is now wide awake with numerous complaints, requests, needs, wishes, ailments, etc. Demands/concerns come flooding in rapidly. I left something downstairs, I need something from Max/Jack/Maggie and Lucy’s room, I have to pee, I forgot to put something in my book bag, I need to check the menu for lunch tomorrow, you have to sign my assignment slip before school, I can’t find my stuffed animal, I have a bug bite, my throat/stomach hurts, I’m thirsty, I need my radio/nightlight on, he took my pillow, can you get the dog up on my bed, the radio is too loud, I can’t hear my radio, can you shut my closet door, his radio is too loud and I can hear it in my room, I need a bandaid, I need some lotion, did you wash my track uniform for tomorrow, by the way Mom, I don’t have any clean socks, I told my teacher I’d bring in a snack for the class tomorrow, is it raining because I think I left my shoes outside, I’m still hungry, tell him not to come in my room after you tuck us in, she’s being mean to me, he didn’t brush his teeth, etc.
2:07 pm: WELCOME TO OREGON
Daun Kesom (laksa leaf, Persicaria Odorata, Vietnamese Coriander), a few stalks
Thanks to caregivers like my mom and rehabilitation centers like the American Stroke Foundation where my mom volunteers at, stroke survivors are having a lot more opportunities.
Location: Duryea Church
Gail and I just had to stay and take some photos of our own. We wished both of them well on their future together and Gail said some complementary things about the bride's dress and shoes. She also asked the photographer for a business card. He said that he didn't have any on him, which to us didn't seem that brilliant, as he might have gained some trade from the people that were watching.
03 - Burning City
Cinderella can’t do anything about the cancelation of her school acceptance. On top of that she has to find out on the spot that her foster mothers(Madam Jo) daughter (Jung-Ah) was on the waiting list for the college, and got in thanks to Cinderella’s cancelation. All the crying doesn’t help. So she finds herself a Motel room. On her way to the Motel we see her walking the streets which should have become the path to her dreams. But now they are full of nastiness and cold.
O cleanse me from my secret faults! Keep your servant also from presumptuous sins lest they get dominion over me; so shall I be undefiled, and innocent of great offence. Let the words of my mouth and the meditation of my heart be acceptable in your sight, O Lord, my strength and my redeemer.
Wow it has been forever since I have posted anything here.
The foundation for a new piece featuring a garden of tropical flowers was created yesterday. As usual, it's made up of recycled materials in the technique I call "ortwork". Scraps of silk sari fabric samples are arranged over an old woolen blanket with a piece of someones excess upholstery fabric as the backing.
Scroll down for more recent posts!
Coffee on the patio this morning. How about toasted home made bread with some honey powder?
"For good luck, protection and strength to the household, place a statue of an elephant, or a pair of elephants, at the front door," advises Asian Feng Shui in an article on Feng Shui Elephant Tips. "When elephants are used in such a way, they are referred to as “Elephants of Many Blessings.” These elephants should have their trunks facing upwards as that represents prosperity, good luck and victory, although elephants with their trunks facing downward represent longevity and conception. The direction of the trunk can affect the chi within the space, so it is important to choose an elephant that will bring about the energy you wish to have in your household or office."
Squats
Walter in Germany, I do not know if you are German or not, but i am amazed by your comment about xenophobes, I believe that it was the Germans who believed themselves to be the master rate, and with the rise of the far right still do, even there bullying of Greece via the EU shows that things have not changed that much.
But as a strong man erect, clothed in blue clothes, advancing,
Jewelry-making class at Michael's on Tuesday, March 20 in Martinsburg, WV from 6-8 pm. You will be making a memory wire bracelet. Pizza will be served. Please bring a drink and/or dessert to share. The cost for this event is $10 in cash please!
I could say this scene is a foundational principle of my dadhood, but it’s closer to the truth to say that it sticks in my head like a broken record. Something about this ridiculous science fiction feels true. That is what a dad must do, I think. At least, that’s what he should try to do: protect the kid. Eliminate cyber-bots and/or bullies, defuse plasma bombs and/or common colds, but be sure you maintain a secure perimeter around that child.
I am in Boston this morning - I sent this out last night - but it is for the 12th- - personal matters took me away – Today I was drawn into thoughts about temptations – I think you will like this post called – Avoid The Temptation……
Integrated Service Delivery Division, Business Development Branch
the card shape was made with a Go Kreate die, and I've used a spellbinders die for the around the main image too,
**(I’m singing my blues)
f) The prohibition to publish statements, photographs, or any other documents that are allegedly connected to said book and video or said thesis.
I cannot believe it is December already. Where did 2010 go? The hardest months are usually the ones where everything is rushed but at the same time there is just is not enough time to fit everything in one day. I could go on in length about the time aspect, being a commuter and dealing with transit delays and working on professional and personal projects that soak up every free block of time. I have to say, I have been pretty good this year with random beer purchases, stuck to my guns and did not buy anything that I knew I would just not like for the sake of trying it. I am, however, still a sucker for seasonal beers that are uninteresting but worth trying. The seasons have officially changed, the news reports snow in some areas, and the temperature has dropped considerably to warrant full winter clothing - all this leads to another seasonal beer run.
**Consequently, if anybody happens to win the painting and would rather have a gift recipient pick out the colours & details, etc. and would like me to wait until AFTER Christmas, that'd be fine by me too! For example if you win & pay for the painting, I can hold onto it until after the holidays, and you could give somebody a surprise card Christmas morning with a "Hey, now Jasmine will now email you ask you how you'd like your own special painting finished" - etc. - I'm happy to be in on it!
How far along? 22 weeks
The flowery May, who from her green lap throws
The basis for "control" is, first of all, over 75 years out of date. It goes back to the idea that drinking, any amount of drinking, was dangerous for anyone, not just alcoholics. More to the point, control of alcohol was more about morals than it was about anything else. Here's what The Almighty Liquor Code says about why the PLCB was founded:
Angélique in Love
Jen and Sally looked at one another, then they looked at Judd, then they broke up laughing.
I'm not going to make very many excuses, except that my job has been crazy, and this really is the first minute and burst of energy that i'm using to do this post. Once my event in April is all done, you're going to gain more confidence in me...promise! Plus, i'll even have pictures to prove it. So let's just get into it...
hate was just a legend
On the eye - Bronze meets copper in a dark alley for a fistfight which, mercifully, ends in a draw.
A certain someone has been harassing me for a loping video. I finally figured out how to manage it since there's never anyone to video for me, and I set out to accomplish it today. The video didn't turn out as well as I had hoped because the sun was shining at the camera lens and I had to position it pretty far away to get most of the arena in view. The problem with "most of the arena" was that all the good stuff happened outside of the camera's view. I still might post it, but I might end up trying again, and hope for better results.
I can remember watching the crowds with a pair of binoculars from the top balcony window of our small apartment in Durban. We had been following the April 1994 election results on television, and it was just moments after the final election results were announced. The racket in the streets that day was a sight and sound I will never forget! A mass of thousands-upon-thousands of Blacks stormed up the streets, chanting jubilantly and using everything from dustbin-covers to car wheel-caps as drums and symbols to make an ear-deafening racket. I was thankful that our one-and-only State vehicle was safely locked up in the basement that night, while I watched in amazement as looters smashed windows and randomly plundered unoccupied vehicles parked on the side of the road. I can recall thinking how outnumbered we were. The words, “God help us!” also flashed through my mind.
I stood at the door with the swatter in hand read to attack.... Or to run and slam the door shut. One time the wasp flew in my direction, and I hit it with the swatter. After that, I was afraid because while I *did* hit it with the swatter, I didn't kill it. I just (I'm sure) ticked it off. Then I couldn't find it. Heh, at one point I screamed loud enough to wake the dead because I saw a shadow behind me that I thought was the wasp. It wasn't. I'm just a chicken.
Walking into the kitchen, she looks out the window over the sink toward Tucker’s house. A faint light can be seen shining through Tucker’s bedroom window. April can suddenly smell the familiar smoky interior mixed with the pungent body odor of Tucker and her brothers.
So he went up and looked, and said, “There is nothing.” And seven times he said, “Go again.”
Dates: Jul 16-17; Age/Grade Range: 9-12yo
Chanel - the epitome of elegance - across the street from Crocs - the epitome of bad. I refer you to the Manolo for a commentary on Crocs.
on Pep Guardiola: I don’t have to comment anything because it was his own decision. When coaches are let go, we all deserve solidarity and positive words, even criticism towards those clubs that have fired coaches who did great work, but Guardiola’s case has nothing to do with this. It’s his decision and the most important thing is that he’s happy with his own decision… I hope he is able to enjoy himself, which is the most important thing in life. If for him enjoying himself means leaving football, then let it be. A hug for him.
Waking up at 7 am on a Sunday? Might be absolutely unimaginable for many people but in fact was the best I could have done yesterday: I got the amazing opportunity to attend the first day of PURE London, UK's favourite fashion buying destination with a fair number of over 1000 brands presenting their collections. And what a day that was.
The last 500 words:
(Paul King/ Mick Roberts, ‘Love & Pride’)
Well, I know she likes other chicks. And I know that she has a website to teach people about female anatomy which is pretty thoughtful.
quote..
and causes me to worry that
I shuddered but obediently took up my job, scanning the far side of the shore where we were headed. The tree branches were mostly devoid of leaves by now and they waved at me threateningly. A squirrel jumped from a bush right as my sight passed over it and I nearly dropped the glasses. Emily got us to the bank with all haste and immediately stood up. She shoved one oar down into the silty ground, steadying the boat as much as possible. Meg grabbed the other oar and scraped away at the muddy tarp. Inch by tantalizing inch, the red bag grew more visible. I paused from my terrified searching of the shoreline to watch her efforts.
Gremlin: No! She said California Wii!
~a physical, ~a mental, ~an emotional, and ~a spiritual.
If you’re wondering about the more food part, its all to do with your metabolism rate. Even in todays age we still follow the three main meals; Breakfast, Lunch, and Dinner. This is an eating schedule that does not change around the world.
SANE is an autonomous network for the creation of a humane, just, sustainable and culturally appropriate economic system in South Africa
Your efforts must be genuine with 2. established goals. One of the great differentiators for businesses in social media is the degree to which they hone an online personality. If communications are one dimensional and devoid of interesting content, people will be unlikely to engage with you.
What about you? How do you feel when a photograph reveals that the style you felt inside was belied by the look projected on the outside? Do you shrug it off or shrink in mortification? Do tell. . . (as for me, life's too short for worrying about what's already done, especially if all we're talking is wrinkles and rumples -- but those pants have got to go!)
This week I'm going to be sharing some of my favorite ways to contain and organize in my home. I hope this will be a week of ideas and inspiration for you - hopefully you have some of these containers and just haven't thought to use them in these ways.
Hope you enjoyed. Love, A.
Seer, seer: God’s love sees now
03. All Down The Line
For me, this means experimenting with some of the ingredients. It also means having some freedom to determine how I want to divvy up the dough. I can make a double batch of bread, baking some into loaves for sandwiches and shaping the rest into dinner rolls, sandwich rolls, hamburger rolls, cinnamon rolls, pizza shells and English muffins. These all freeze well and taste much better than their store-bought counterparts.
Brothers, I wanted to convey my message, and warn my people that this is prohibited, shameful, and inappropriate. It points to stupidity in the treatment of others, and ignorance of what Islam obliges us to do about this.
Based on the evidence, I will grant that he made some fantastic design decisions, but not that he was an expert on effective decision processes.
“No, my child,” the lady said, as if to soothe his unease, then smiled. Over the table she reached and took his hand (how cold her small hand was despite the fire) and said, “Do you have a ring, Christopher? A ring with a blue lapis lazuli stone, cut at an odd angle, as if something was missing from it?”
As for what my next project is, well, it gets a little fuzzier. I have several ideas, mostly book-related, but not one that’s jumping out, saying “Pick me! Pick me!” I’m hoping time will steer me towards a delicious and fulfilling project.
Air sex.
Powder the top of the molded button.
Generally, they mean that person is passionate about something; they make the beauty of their art visible and moving to the rest of the world.
I return to the issue of pacing as I consume urban fantasy at a voracious rate. In Florida I tore through the rest of the Sookie Stackhouse catalog and started on Simon Green’s Nightside books. The first book in the Age of Misrule series is next. One book that came highly recommended, but that I can’t seem to complete, is Vickie Pettersson’s Scent of Shadows.
For the Management and Professional Group (Grades 41 to 54), the increase is 15 per cent while those in the Premier Grade (Jusa) will get a 7.5 per cent pay hike.
But unlike the South’s ancestor, this tunnel didn’t lead to freedom from oppression or slavery. But to yet another road of uncertainty. Again, there was no magical path to peace and prosperity.
And the watcher who waits by the dim, dark gates,
outside your bedroom window ...
38. Men of integrity
The bottle says "enjoy from the fridge for extra sharpness". I've read that two or three times and I'm still baffled by what it means and how it could be true.
You need to get a ticket here. Cool thing is - you put your money in a vending machine and get a ticket for that amount. Then, every time you use it, money is subtracted. You can recharge the same card. I'm like a total authority on the CTA now! Aren't you impressed? (By the way, the attendant thought I was nuts for taking a picture of this. He asked me, "Is it really that interesting?" I was afraid he'd think I was even more insane if I told him I was going to blog about it.)
“Losing a bookshop from a village like Dalkey is like having the brain removed. It needs a nerdy hub like the Exchange. It’s one thing ordering a book on Amazon, but Michael spoke to customers about authors, titles and the village itself. I hope some local has the sense to invest in the bookshop.”
We spent a lot of this last weekend with me directing Andrew on where to move things that I had intended to take care of, but really couldn't manage on my own. While I prize my "Lady Hulk" title, I am learning to ask for help when I need it. And ask I did.
If they have signed a contract or purchased something over the counter from you, then they are very inclined to buy more from you right now. The add-on sales is easier than the initial sell to.
Letting go without care
Set the oven at 220℃. Cut up the tomatoes into eight pieces (or six depending on size), de-seed the pepper and chop into 2 cm pieces (approx) and put into a roasting tin. Slice the garlic and scatter over the tomatoes and peppers with some coarse sea salt (I like to use the coarse unbleached sel de mer) and black pepper and put into the pre-heated oven. Cook for 45 minutes or until the tomatoes are soft and the skin starting to blacken lightly.
Our heroine is Rowena, who is coerced by her stepbrother Gilbert into agreeing to marry a man she despises. Gilbert accompanies her to her intended's castle to make sure the marriage is consummated. When Rowena manages to escape defloration,Gilbert doesn't take it well.
You Give = We Give will run from September 10th until the middle of December. The ability to donate money through the donate button will however end earlier (November 30th) due to the fact that it will take up to 10-15 days for any purchased novels to arrive from the Book Depository. During this time you can either:
The batter is thick, and the pancakes will puff up pretty high. I carefully watched the griddle, so that it was about medium hot, and let these cook until I see bubbles forming. The batter is thick, so it took a good 2 minutes, before flipping them.
Race Record: Starts: 23; Wins: 5; 2nd: 4; 3rd: 3; Win & Place Prize Money: £149,906
Six months before, I was watching a cooking show by Anjum Anand telecasted over TV. She was explaining about all the cooking facts, do's and don’ts about Indian cooking which inspired me a lot and made me to look into one of her books "I love curry". I have tried many recipes from that book and today also I am planning to post her Tofu and Pea curry which paired well with hot steamed rice.
3 cups penne pasta, uncooked
As well, we enjoyed visiting during the intermission with friends we've made who have subscriptions for the same night as we do. In fact, we even got photographed as we chatted with another couple, our photo added (with our permission) to the VOA's Facebook page, Fashion at the Opera
“This is a problem with their military culture where they think the senior commander should be at the front,” a military official said.
Scripture gives us the true answer: ‘In Bethlehem of Judah.’ Bethlehem means ‘house of bread’ and Judah ‘one who praises’.
To what the “aim” of the United States is as their war against the world has now entered its 10th year, the FSB says, is to prevent “at all costs” the implosion of the US Dollar as the main reserve currency of the present global economic system before the West’s envisioned “New World Order” can be established.
150g good quality milk chocolate, chopped
The only part that was truly irritating (in a not kinda-on-purpose way, like Scott and Ramona’s repellent immaturity) was the forced happy ending. They’ve both realised they need to get out of their niche and grow up in order to make new, less sociopathic relationship mistakes, but they bring each other along. Their relationship has been successfully argued as an extension of their mutual issues – they barely know each other, and have used each other as identity props. Scott wants to be cool, and he thinks Ramona’s cool. Ramona wants to be nice, and she thinks Scott’s nice. Together, they can only backslide into vapidity trying to keep their happy ending.
Everyone has something to learn and everyone has something to teach. Sometimes your learning moments can come in the most surprising places and from people you would never expect. The key is to always remain open for learning opportunities. Once you shut yourself off and decide that most people have nothing to teach you, you truly stop learning. This is The Trash Mans Guide to Time Management.
You go to the embassy parties
The bill does prevent openly carrying a weapon in certain locations, such as schools, colleges, airports and bars.
Many girls have e-mailed me about hair these past few weeks, so this is dedicated to you all! ♥
- In the Recovery HD:
“Well, of all the nerve! I will have you know I enjoyed every minute of today. It was a blast. It’s a good thing you don’t work with me Minnie. I can’t stand a party pooper.”
2. Contribute to the conversation.
Hate the label.
After cutting out and baking the cookies using my favorite sugar cookie recipe from the book "Pretty Party Cakes", I used black royal icing to pipe my borders, and then filled in the various colors in each section (kind of like paint by numbers!). This was by far the most complicated cookie I've made so far - usually my cookies only have 2 to 3 colors, but this one had 6 different colors!
Wright Brothers' Memorial, Kitty Hawk, North Carolina.
So what does this mean for Game Masters? It means one simple thing:
The evidence is staring us in the face.
Palate: Without water, mainly Seville oranges and vanilla. Really needs water to tame it. Not particularly complex, the water brings out some nuttiness--at first creamy, then bitter. Also orange dark chocolate, sherry and more vanilla, but you have to work hard to pick up any of it.
Mark you calendars for Tuesday, August 30th for the next E-Team blog hop. It will be another installment of "It's Better With Color" series featuring Claudine Hellmuth Studio Paints.
Koichi talks about visiting the cinema but not understanding the film, playing billiards and buying a big-bowled pipe and tobacco.
James L. Hobin, 47, Marlborough, Conn.
Dutton Children’s Books will publish her second novel for young adults, Living on Impulse, on August 20, 2009. She lives in Los Angeles, with her husband and young son.
The President of the Republic might set up special bodies, councils and committees whose tasks and mandates are set out in the decisions taken to create them.
While the tournament continues, Meade is already focused on planning for 2010′s 10th annual Dawg Daze Softball Tournament.
People who think that there will ever be peace in the Middle East don't know their history; that lot have been going at it for over 7,000 years now. I could kinda see the point when it was the Fertile Crescent, Garden of Eden thing going on, but now? It's just a bunch of smelly, unwashed, brown people, and I see no reason for putting up with that unless you're getting Mexican food. They should all be forced to read "Guns, Germs, and Steel," so they can realize that they do not have it going on anymore.
Picture Keeper is available for purchase on their website (www.picturekeeper.com) as well as in national retailers, catalogs, and scrapbooking supply stores. It has recently become available at select Walgreens stores, which is a convenient location to buy Picture Keeper and print photos!
-Who in clothing: boy ~9 ys, Lederhosen
There is no further information known or that can be divulged about the soundboard source for the Lyceum track.
I have been passed my Lucky 7 by the talented Debz-Hobbs Wyatt, writer, my friend, business partner, conscience and my favourite dog-owner. (Rosie's Mum to be exact!)
Al says yes. “AB was using Mt. Hood in Michelob and the feedback was positive. The farmers out here were expecting massive contracts, but they never came. We thought with Liberty and Mt Hood we had the upper hand, but about then AB started ramping up Spalter and Tradition. Eventually, of course, even those apparently got the shaft, when AB was bought out by InBev.”
Those journalists should go walking around some of these areas alone at night and then see whether or not there are ‘no go’ areas in Luton or anywhere else they have been reported, or speak to the anti-terror squad for a risk assessment of these places after dark.
“What has the government done to improve the efficiency and competence of government servants? There isn’t really competition there if the service is dominated by one race. There isn’t sufficient quality if the entry-level qualifications are so-so.
On June 12, 1963, Medgar Evers pulled up in the driveway, and stepped out of his car. As he walked into his home, ready to greet his wife and children, he was shot in the back with a bullet that richocheted into his home. He died 50 minutes later, just as President John F. Kennedy was concluding a nationally televised speech in support of civil rights.
I hardly ever decorate for Valentines Day....maybe some conversation hearts and other candies in my apothecary jars but that is normally about it.
We held hands, and we marched. My fear depleted and we became stronger. Our fear became our strength, because together, those bullies don’t stand a chance. I knew at that moment, if all else fails, I could rely on us — the rakyat. Because the rakyat are decent, whose dream is only to see our futures are chartered right, and our country prosper.
-Cut flower life extended 3-fold
London Philharmonic Orchestra conducted by Jean Martinon
Dear Brown Thomas Winter Sale,
People that you haven’t heard
Embossing on sun, clouds and water: Cuttlebug
The maybe Grammie part of me says: "Can't I just put it on facebook"????
Saturday (my birthday) dawned absolutely gorgeous, and despite a jam packed schedule, nothing was getting in the way of my horse time. After reading Val at Memoirs of a Horse Girl's recent post which had some great video of she and Harley jumping a cloverleaf pattern over cross rails, I had the bright idea to lay ground rails in the same pattern, an X basically, and use them to spice up our trot work.
It makes me wonder WHY the media didn't pick up on this story (here)...maybe it was because the story was buried in the Business section of the paper, where not too many tend to go?
Since The Sunny Side Up Show with Chica, Kevin, Kelly and Sean debuted a year ago, over 300,000 submissions have been received from viewers across the country (including emails, phone calls, birthday cards, jokes, weather reports, etc.).
MFG Brand Name : Lithonia Lighting
If anybody reading this is of a particularly patriotic bent, be warned that this might offend. I say, also, that this is not the lengthy essay it could be, merely an off-the-cuff blog post written at the end of a long, long day. Pax.
there is something elegant and wistful about her. but it is somehow a testament to the marketing genius of the danes that such a little statue is such a big attraction. she's actually going to be sent to china to be part of the world exposition and she'll be there for about a year. we think that's pretty cool that the little mermaid gets to travel.
alongbine: Yes you did, but I doubt that it will make a difference when I tell her. ha ha ha ha
I mentioned in my last composer post that most western classical music written prior to the 20th century doesn't interest me. Carlo Gesualdo is one of the other exceptions. He was born in the middle of the 16th century and lived until 1613.
My visit to Michigan was a paragon of perfection. I would not Butterfly Effect anything about my visit other than the fact that I had to leave and go back to reality. I truly enjoyed myself, even when we just sat around and did nothing, but watch tv.
As if it were a painter’s regret.
It was this moment where MY Commander saw this woman chasing after me and asked me what was going on. Before I could reply, the woman started in on how disrespectful I was being etc.etc. She was shushed and then she asked me again what was going on. “Sorry Lt Col Jost, I was headed to the track to time my run when this lady stopped me accusing me of not following her orders, then demanded, even though I’m not volunteering at this function, to set up refreshments. I don’t even know where to get what she is asking for and I have places to be after I leave here.”
The harmony linking you all, and him,
When Chingoma died he left three sons, Rushavashava, Chirikadzi and Masarirambi.
Good news though– from the Kangaroo courts of all places.
What sort of developments taking place in manufacturing green waterproofing products and systems?
He's a little bundle of love and we love him! So happy to have him in our family! We love you, Caleb! XOXO Grandma and Grandpa Sparks
A bizarre, witty and charming film about a cineaste’s love of film and the importance it plays in the meaningfulness of his life. Its inherent tragedy should also serve as a timely reminder in our times of financial austerity towards funding for the arts.
Victory
Chums of Chance fly on
Even more importantly, the UN Declaration on the Rights of Indigenous Peoples states that all indigenous peoples have the right to define who is part of their nation and who is not.
But those who see everything in the Lord or everything of the Lord and also see in everything an eternal relation of the Lord, so that there is nothing within their purview of sight except the Lord, are called the maha-bhagavatas, or the first-grade devotees of the Lord. Such first-grade devotees of the Lord are perfect in all respects.
Green Aware as the theme of this year’s CNIE-RCIÉ conference challenges us to think about education in green ways: as something we must protect to ensure quality, inclusiveness, and access for both learners and teachers. Given that the “tie that binds” CNIE-RCIÉ members is use of educational technology in learning situations, this year’s conference is about sharing practices, research findings, and applications that contribute to one or more of the following three sub-themes:
It's something we expect our kids to do when they're tiny and yet we find it almost impossible as adults.
And…..if I’m faking it, then that means I could probably fake other mental illnesses, right? So, could you fake an Obsessive-Compulsive Disorder for any real length of time?? Like beyond minutes, hours, or days?? How about for over a year? Could you do that with Aspergers?? Could you feign Schizophrenia?? Agoraphobia?? Or Bipolar Disorder? You might could for awhile, but chances are you couldn’t keep it up 24/7. Would it feel like it fit? Or would it feel like you were wearing someone else’s clothes? If you think you could, go for it! I know I couldn’t. I would get tired. I would forget. I would let my guard down. It would feel very awkward. Funny thing about this DID, though…..it doesn’t feel awkward. In fact, since I was diagnosed, I feel like I’m finally in my right “clothes”. It’s been sort of like when people come out as homosexual. They feel like finally they are being true to themselves. There is that same sense for me with DID….that ahhhh…..I can finally be. And it’s ok. And I no longer have to hide it. I suppose I am not faking it.
However, of all the attacks it seems it is the old who have suffered most frequently at the hands of the monsters responsible for the relentless bloodshed. At least one thousand of those killed were of an age, where in other societies they would have been collecting their pensions and looking forward to their well deserved retirement.
Catholics teach that a priest can forgive sin, but a priest is only a man. Isn’t it true that only God can forgive sin? I don’t mean in a way that any of us can forgive one another, but in the way that God forgives and saves us.
Even with normal old table salt and not freshly ground black pepper,
And pretty maids all in a row."
Writers: such services are not a good use of your money. Bookstores (or libraries, or newspapers, or book reviewers, or whatever demographic the service claims to access for you) do not pay attention to spam solicitations. The catalog (assuming it's actually mailed) or email (assuming it gets past the recipient's spam filter) will probably be trashed. At most it may be glanced at. The odds of anyone paying any attention to your book as a result of mass-mail-style promotions are vanishingly small.
Quirky.
Tempted and tried, we’re oft made to wonder
Who knows what else might be flowing down the river that day?
With what confidence and comfort ought we to assist at Holy Mass, it being the most powerful means to satisfy entirely for our sins? Just the same as if we had been present at Calvary, and taking up the blood which fell from our Saviour’s wounds to the ground, had offered it to his eternal Father, in satisfaction, and to have obtained pardon for all our sins. As we should not then have doubted of it, we ought no more to question it now, when at Holy Mass we offer the same blood unto his Divine Majesty,to satisfy for them. If with a firm faith and sincere sorrow we do so, there is no offence, however great, which this sacrifice will not wash away.
A man who claims to have had sex with 1,000 cars has defended his “romantic” feelings towards vehicles.
It’s common knowledge that having an open NAT for your 360 can improve your on-line experience therefore most of you will have set this up already. Changing my network settings back to auto worked for me last night but did not work for me today. Still, if you’re having trouble with your favorite EA Sports title you might want to try it in a pinch. You’ll just have to switch back to the manual setting when you want to play Call of Duty or Halo, games that prefer an open NAT. I do believe I’ve found a solution that works but it’s akin to sacrificing your first born to the EA Server gods… Okay, maybe not, but it is a pain in the arse.
Through out the weeks my Spanish began to grow more and more. Although the language barrier was strong, I always felt a presence of warmth in her family and that was by far the best part of staying in Peru. They brought me into their family and Peru has become a second home for me.
Sometimes I have trouble deciding whether I should support zoos altogether,
It's amazing how fast an upset grandmother can crochet. Due to privacy issues I can't share what happened to my oldest granddaughter. I just hope she can get some comfort. I would need my daughter's permission and then it's a question of just how much one should share on a blog. So, I will talk about the yarn.
Of course the answer is culture. But who can you use an example to your organization to give you a chance to shift your organizational culture? The answer ironically is IBM!
Come to think of it, this past weekend was full of parties. On Friday we went to see how the new Foam Lab were doing at their first event (read all about it over at Liset’s) and then we were off to the Nieuwmarkt where there was a festival going on.
blended with roasted pablano peppers, fresh lime juice, topped with
I am still mourning the loss of those 15 hours.
A: In Creeping with the Enemy, I introduce an ongoing story – a mystery about Chanti’s family – that will provide a backdrop to the new case Chanti will work in each book. As her detective skills grow, she’ll use them to solve the bigger family mystery. When I first thought up the series, I wanted to take Chanti into college because I was working on a college campus at the time and figured I could use that experience in the book. But as slowly as I’m progressing through her junior year, I think that would take more than the six or seven books I had originally planned. But so much of how long a series lasts is driven by how long the readers want to keep reading it.
Booster Action Max (Survival Mode) Complete Booster Action Affiliated 3 by assault Diddy Kong
3. In a large bowl, combine the pasta with the roasted vegetables, marinara sauce, all the cheeses except the Parmesan, the peas, and the remaining salt and pepper. Gently mix using a wooden spoon until all the pasta is coated with sauce and the ingredients are combined.
(rimshot)
At this point, as well as still doing all of those things, I'm also very involved with the freedom-based education movement in my home city, as well as the wider unschooling/freedom-based education community through the making of connections and friendships with people scattered across North America (and beyond!). Basically? I think unschooling is really, really cool, and that the ideas found in that philosophy can be a powerful tool of both personal and social transformation.
The annual conference is the major professional development activity for Oklahoma CareerTech teachers, counselors, administrators and state staff. Participants learn innovative technical and instructional skills, and also have the opportunity to network with and learn from their counterparts throughout the state.
Nor shall the serpent molest me“
I inked up one of my new stamps MFT a la mode's Hot Cocoa Cutie. I stamped the image with memento tuxedo black ink and coloured her face and hair. I stamped the image a second time and coloured her hands and boots. On the boots I then used some black flocking. Her pants are paper pieced with riding hood red cs, the mug is paper pieced with a piece of MME's Be Merry, as is her sweater. For the marshmallow's I used some white liquid applique and let it dry.
“Oh yeah, that bastard.” She laid the mirror on the bed, and then purposely stood in a position that put her lady lumps right in my face. I had no choice but to look .They were her only redeeming quality.
Puzzled by the writing and the contents, she read to her husband, "Betty Jo says here that she's got herself a job in a... a... a... well, it must be a 'Message' parlour."
If you’re in the wilderness right now, remember these are times of learning. God is getting ready to do a mighty work in your life. Give Him praise and glory!
SOUNDTRACK: It takes two to make a thing go right! It takes two to make it out of sight! AHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH
The September full moon is actually the Harvest Moon, which is the full Moon that occurs closest to the Autumn Equinox. In two years out of three, the Harvest Moon comes in September, but in some years it occurs in October. Native Americans sometimes refer to it as the Corn moon because it marked the time when corn was supposed to be harvested. The chief Indian staples of corn, pumpkins, squash, beans, and wild rice are now ready for gathering.
The lies you caught
So, here’s an update on things and stuff in general, and the new direction I want to take this blog:
These days the image of a salesman has changed dramatically. The familiar door-to-door salesman has gone the way of the dinosaurs. Now we have guys flashing brochures of gutters and siding, and Girl Scouts tempting us with boxes of calorie-laden goodness. Many salesmen these days have been replaced by buttons on our computer’s that say “add to cart” and “buy now”, and UPS guys in crisp brown uniforms approaching our front doors carrying packages. We also now have, what are called “traveling salesman.” They’re called this because they spend half their lives driving to the four corners of the earth in search of customers to sell things to.
JOB. Been searching the whole year. Had the help of a job coach the first 6 months. Didn’t help much except by fixing my CV a bit. Been to one interview during the year. One. Second half of the year has seen me searching on my own and taking part in a training program for two months where I learned to drive forklifts. The most useful result of the program being just that. The trainee part of the program felt most of all like a waste of everybody’s time because I was doing something I’ve done for 20 years already as an employee, but at least I had something to do for a month and got to be at a regular place of work. Have posted about this previously so I’ll skip the details of that experience.
In the last few months costumes and dressing up have become a big part of my eldest son’s imaginary play. At the moment we have a fire fighter costume, a doctors coat with a case, various hats and some character costumes. He is 3 this weekend and I have noticed that his imagination and role playing have become more vivid and in context with day to day life.
Last summer I went to a book fair thing that was close to my house and there were a bunch of YA authors there who were signing their books that were for sale there. I somehow made my way to this book fair in the middle of Hurricane Irene and got Cyn Balog, along with a bunch of other authors, to sign her books for me! It was pretty awesome, and the fact that my mom works with Mrs. Balog’s husband is pretty cool, too. So on to the book:
Strokes, which are the result of foul play (and I suspect possibly the great bulk of them are due to foul play), are the result of an inappropriate immune system response, sometimes combined with intense emotional reactivity or other somatic activity, such as exercise.. Doctors categorize strokes by their outcome, as sudden neurological deficits. By a deficit they mean weakness and/or loss of sensation and/or some loss of function in the body, such as paralysis in the limbs. And they attribute this to a vascular cause. They distinguish between a transient event and a long lasting deficit, saying that for it to be named a stroke the deficit must last for more than a 24 hour period. They also acknowledge the stroke to be of sudden onset because they cannot, given the outcome only, say anything more about it, although they do acknowledge that the cause may have developed over time. There are two main types of strokes documented in the medical literature.
Summer has arrived (we hit 100°F a couple of days ago!) I’m quite glad. The a/c has been topped off with freon and we’re ready!
For more heart art, photography and altogether fabulous heart stuff from around the world, visit Clytie at Random Hearts for Guest Heart Thursday!
I tried to assure her that I feel fine, and I don't mind doing it. But she wasn't having any of it.
The space inside the fireplace was just big enough to hold me, if I curled up tight: pressing legs tightly to my torso, burying my face in my knees.
Circuit: Mugello Circuit – 5.245 km
The connections in your life create the rich tapestry of our earth existence. The connections in your life create the balance of our living – the balance between living within societal norms and the cosmos; the balance between living within societal norms and your own purpose; the balance between living within your comfort zones and the experiences desired by your Soul self. This show, with its insights and observations regarding Life Connections, is one to not be missed.
Shouting at your husband in front of his friends is typical of a woman who is not in love. True African love means asking no questions and smiling even when things are wrong. Even where you are more intelligent than your lover, act like you do not know anything. Being a fool to give your husband greater glory is love beyond measure.
Twitter is taking over the social media world. It’s becoming more and more popular each day. A recent study showed that 1 in 3 people have a twitter account, an impressive stat. Twitter allows you to interact with people all over the world. Posting photos and tweets from events and breaking news, it’s a great way to stay informed.
“It knocked me off my feet and was shaking the house,” she said. “It sounded like it was next door.”
But we must recognize that such a life does not earn dignity anymore than its opposite merits ignominy. Such a life will not necessarily mean a life of law-abiding conformity. The Gospel is radically subversive. The resurrection is simply one step in God’s story of cosmic insurrection against the forces of evil. The Christian life, rightly understood, is a life of sanctified mischief, undermining injustice through love, generosity, and mercy. And we must understand that injustice knows nothing of national boundaries – we find it amongst ourselves as often as we do amongst perceived outsiders.
What does it mean when you show up at my door,
Mr Wmm: What good is that going to do? I just want to do some washing!
3. You can’t sell or trade with your daughters. They are not consumer goods.
There’s no stopping to hacking spree both by alleged Pinoy and Chinese hackers in relation to the tension at the Scarborough Shoal. Just 2:30pm today the web site of the Department of Budget and Management is defaced by hackers who claimed coming from China.
Grab a chair and fill your platter
So, my mom is a New Year’s ‘baby’ and since she and my dad are the ones that bought the Cricut Imagine for me for Christmas, I decided to use it to make my mom’s birthday card. I mailed it FOREVER ago and I have yet to hear from my mom that she’s received it. She’s horrible about going and getting her mail at the PO! LOL
Plus size news, trends and collections from the last seven days brought together in one place.
I hope, in 5 years, that I'm doing well enough online that I can completely forego local shows except one or two for market research. Given the incredible sales increase I've seen in the past 6-8 months, the sky is the limit. My dream is to open another B&M but one supporting other handmade biz, too. Not just mine. So far, that is still a dream.
Taking drugs meant orange-flavoured chewable aspirin.
I am writing this letter to you on my own computer and sending it out for publication via my own email. I am not, and have never been, a member of any political party, of any communist party anywhere including the Communist Party of India (Marxist) or CPI(M).
The men argue until Tough Tony Titwiler tells Jimmy Ray Dupree to get off his property.
All the time I've been enjoying my own Ahtanum Pale, or the ESB, or the Simcoe Pale, I've had a few good times down at the Elephant Room listening to the Monster Big Band quaffing a few Flying Dog Pales. At least I get a small bit of a variation on my Pales.
The message that is received by people especially in other countries is that America is one of the most dangerous places on earth, where murder is supposedly commonplace, while in fact many other countries have higher murder rates and higher crime rates in general.
News sites like Reddit, Drudge Report, Huffington Post, and (need I say it) Fox News are some of the leaders in the creation of a MOBSTER (I wish that word wasn’t already taken, so that I could use it for the media-created monsters people become when they take their faceless place in a virtual mob.), but few media outlets are innocent, and I honestly believe that this fostering of reader/viewer extremism is one the of scariest types of extremism out there! Granted, sometimes these mobs can actually turn into revolutionaries (see THE MIDDLE EAST at the moment), but do I even need to go into fundamental differences between the Egyptian, Tunisian, Libyan “rebels”, and the media-fueled couch warriors who spend their days scolding people like Greg Mortenson? No? Yeah, I didn’t think so.
So without further adieu. Here is our list.
If it isn’t clear from my opening paragraph, I avoid revealing the identities of my subjects on this blog. Tonight I gave my friends the option of creating their alter egos, which is how our hosts came to be known as Genevieve and You Think of Something. Also in attendance were the couple Pancho and Pippin, their roommate Habib, and the youngster Lampshade, who is about to celebrate his twenty fifth birthday.
How sad to have let things get that far. How sad for me to not see the GIANT blessing my Heavenly Father had seen fit to send my little family. There is a song by Sara Evans that I think sums it right up:
Now, I have never covered up the fact that I am strongly pro choice. As long as the choice is the woman's/ the couple's, not the surrounding community's, and definitely not the treating doctor's.
Unfortunately, the marvelously efficient and top-heavy Late-Roman bureaucracy Justinian installed in Belisarius’s wake brought back all the old complaints of the empire, unequal, and often self-defeating taxation (of course, you never get anyone in the Roman historical record PRAISING taxes, even if it’s for the Roman equivalent of schools and roads – and that goes equally for 21st century America).
KIDDING. Kidding. I have my first place choices and then a whole slew of honorable mentions. So without further ado:
Urine therapy is the use of one’s urine, internally or externally, to heal wounds or alleviate disease symptoms and/or for overall well-being. It is also called uropathy, auto-urine therapy, amaroli, or shivambu.
loses its way around the suns.
Otherwise, OLBOJ is healthy, and quite content to stay in the climate-controlled environment of my uterus.
2026.E-X/19/1971. “A Protest from Greece-By Proxy”. On the lack of public political discourse in Greece. Chicago Daily News, October 19, 1971, p. 12.
Accessories: Whisper White Taftetta Ribbon, Vintage Flowers, Pearls
or they refuse to get self out of the way and have empathy for others. I
Second Point of Fact: John Mackey is not a badass. When inserting themselves (badly) into their fiction, a lot of amateur zombie writers have a main character that is highly trained, well prepared, resourceful and intelligent. Mackey, on the other hand, doesn't even know what model of pistol he has, and will probably prove woefully inadequate in a firefight, when the time comes. He is a drug dealer, not an ex sniper survivalist with a basement full of high end rifles with thousand dollar scopes.
Are you willing to leave home and lose the blessing of your father?
Art College Winchester 11th November 1977
*He is starting to coo and has these little baby laughs but I don't think they are real yet but are still super cute.
One day the Lord sent a Great Stone of Fire from the Heavens which hit the earth and made a great groaning in the world. The sky grew dark and cold and there was again a long ice age. And so I have watched and learned much through many an ice age since then and have journeyed far within the freezing hand of the Water Lord.
Thanks for stopping by. I hope you have a fabulous day!
7. Never forget it is all about human connections, and the best way to do that is
Theo is down. What is going on? Makeup artist Gillian McCormick just saw a murder and has to get away. With the help of an eighty year old woman she is pushed onto a cruise for nerds. Gillian was a nerd herself and gets a makeover and become voluptuous and has to live up to her new attitude. With PI Lex Manchester she was willing to give the diguise a go.
after all this pain and strife there better damn well be a prize.
everyone and wants to be picked up by everyone. This was not meant as a
Actually, I think the opposite applies and that this casting by numbers is insulting to the intelligence of any audience and rarely results in anything truly special.
seep
Reid: I like him - he once killed a guy
Surely Gani would apply the full force of the law without any doubt, delay or deliberation. The penalty would be severe. The all-too-familiar mob would be braying for their blood. Lock them up, lash them or even lynch them? Non-Muslims would be threatened with a looming May 13 or Feb 13!
Pete pressed the button on his radio, “They’ve spread out from the north end of the yard to the south end of the driveway. They’re spread out about every 30 degrees at roughly 25 yards from the house.
Al-Gamal promised to study the request, saying that he visited the cathedral to check on Shenouda's health. Shenouda was just back from a 18-day trip to the US where he regularly goes for medical treatment.
And here is James on his very first Halloween! . . . . It was really hard to get him to sit still for a photo, but I think we managed.
For more months
“African-Americans have had the same or greater interest rates in entrepreneurship (as other racial/ethnic groups),” says Woodard, a sociologist who has researched work-force diversity and labor force patterns. As evidence, he cited recent U.S. Census data. In July, the Census Bureau released its “Preliminary Estimates of Business Ownership by Gender, Ethnicity, Race and Veteran Status: 2007” report that revealed a 45.6 percent increase in the number of minority-owned businesses from 2002 to 2007.
It is a great loss that you are dead and gone”
But I do have some pages for you...
June 2011 - My girlfriends come to visit in Denver
My children don’t look very much like me so I would always wonder if they looked like her ? Or my birth dad.
"So, I was happy to step up and do what I felt was a public service because I so believed in him and I still do," she said.
I know it’s not my son .
Waist - 12" to 25.5"
This recipe is a favorite side dish in my family, especially during the summer for all of our cookouts. The flavors blend beautifully for a zesty, sweet side dish packed with delicious and colorful veggies and beans. Just one bite, and you will be a fan for life!
The 2007 Bodegas Paso Robles Viva Tu! ($28) is produced from 100% Tempranillo, from the French Camp Vineyard in Paso Robles. The wine spent about 23 months in the barrel, a mix of new and neutral French and American oak. It has an alcohol content of 13.8% and only 125 cases were produced. The wine has a deep red, almost purple color, and an enticing spicy nose. On the palate, the spiciness was strong and appealing, with undercurrent of black fruits, vanilla, and leather. The tannins were moderate and the finish was fairly long, and very satisfying. This wine felt like some of the modern-style Tempranillo wines from Spain and would be perfect for a hearty dish, from a pasta Bolognese to a steak.
Once the situation was under control, I went to talk to my oldest and we talked about strength and how he was bigger and stronger than his little brother. We talked about injuries and how he could do long term damage to someone doing what he did. Then I gave him the consequences that were going to come down because of his actions. He was mad and didn't want to do what I was telling him he had to do but I had to stick to my guns and make him follow through with the punishment. I can only hope and pray that the consequences were enough for him to understand that he cannot do that any more. But what do we do in the moment when our kids do the stupidest thing we have ever seen? How do we handle it and what do we say?
I hope you had a good weekend. Ours was filled with Saturday soccer games, a piano recital, a Cinco de Mayo party, and some family room progress.
Nope. It hasn't happened.
Some readers are convinced that a cozy is supposed to be genteel and soft-spoken, with no visible blood, no mention of sex, and no off-color langage. But if you examine the original cozies by Agatha Christie, her murders were pretty grisly, and adultery and fornication were rampant. But when it came to speech, neither Miss Marple nor Hercule Poirot would have uttered even a mild expletive, and they certainly wouldn’t have mentioned a body part that never saw light. But Miss Marple and Poirot represented people of a certain class and time, neither of which still exists.
I never knew what that song was about. Now I finally get it. Liver disease.
§ With all my heart I have sought Thee; Do not let me wander from Thy
Bookstore; and
His supporters say; “Beunka is indigent – he has no money to pay for a defence and his state-appointed defence attorney is overworked and unable to help him. We need to raise $150,000 to pay for a private lawyer and investigator to help save Beunka’s life”.
So many dates of loss, anniversaries, birthdays, burial dates, etc.
From New Mexico we tended to leave long before dawn to avoid the desert heat and, unless we were branching off at Flagstaff, Arizona for the Grand Canyon, drive right through to Los Angeles, Californ-I-A, where we would be welcomed with open arms by Andrew’s cousin Mischa.
This stunning single long-stemmed red rose is made completely out of cardstock and various Stampin' Up! punches and dies. Yep, that's right.........cardstock!.....and the Blossom Petals Builder Punch (121808) and the new Hearts Collection Framelits Dies (125599).
Today is Earth Day! And my first four pictures are artwork made by school kids. I find their images of earth both fragile and strong.
One final thought about Goal #2 ~ PICTURE BOOKS. I write in three areas: young adult, middle grade, and picture books. For me, writing picture books is just natural. I have four children and for years have created stories off the cuff to get them to sleep or to keep them quiet in the car. It never occured to me that I should actually write them down until I participated in Tara Lazar's PiBoIdMo 2010. It was fantastic and totally revved me up to write PBs.
Blogspot is good for what it is... but I've been thinking of converting to Wordpress. Any opinions, experience, etc?
The program will start at 7 p.m. Wednesday, at the Ike Box, 299 Cottage St. NE, Salem. Information can be found at the website of Oregonians for Alternatives to the Death Penalty, oadp.org, or at (503) 990-7060.
I realized I have more people I can call friends than I have fingers on both hands.
I was literally there just for 3 events and did not have time to walk the floor and check out what's was going on.
OK, first of course you have to decide what to you want to do, I made a border for my card, see below. So I cut a piece of Grunge paper in 2x14cm, I have a Sizzix which I used to emboss the pattern I wanted to have on my border.
Roller derby chicks. Check. Jimmy Fallon. Check. Hilarity, hi-jinks and hip checks. Check.What more do you need? Oh ya, beer! For this particular pic I've picked a pickled pepper - oops, got carried away there. Sorry.
Tanishq jewellers have a store at Shoppers’ Stop in Juhu and therefore, the image has made it’s way on to a carry bag. Click on the link to my earlier post to see what it looks like: No Riksha Day Outfit
I am so excited to share this post with you!!!
The two of them sat quietly the rest of the way home, except for a few mumblings from the back seat. she went on about being used to your abuse, and you never cared not now not ever, never did never will. To hear a daughter say those sort of things to her mother made me wonder what kind of life this young woman had growing up with a mother like this.
This is very interesting, isn't it? As we know, with unseemly haste, our Tory council is flogging off anything they can lay their sweaty little hands on in a car boot sale of our heritage and property assets: museums, libraries, playing fields.
Lets get down to it.
I liked Shaun of the Dead (although I didn’t particularly care for some of the Frost/Pegg followup films like Hot Fuzz) and the trailer for it looked funny, so I went along.
Tue 9/23 Columbus, OH Newport Music Hall
to believe, or buy into a pre-packaged notion without checking into its formations, or overall mission, is irresponsible. any organization claiming “locality” or “home-grown” whatever ought to adjust and modify its mission to accommodate each and every additional human which joins it. it must. the world will not bow to an unchanging juggernaut of power any more. we are leaning that very lesson right now.
I am still at it... increasing the number slowly and after I read the article I push myself to do those extra few crunches. And the needle on the scale is slowly tilting to the left!
"Attendees of The Wedding University at Four Seasons Hotel Silicon Valley will be able to select from a variety of presentation topics and educational seminars, including the following:
There it is. Oh, this is so wonderful for a woman who likes lots of light in her kitchen. One flip of the switch and I have it!
Oh got a really bad wave of nausea...I think I'll stop now and go lie down, or is that lay down? Don't correct me. I don't really care. :P
Today I (finally!) have a new card to share with you, for this week's challenge at Tuesday Throwdown. Our theme this week is "Pretty Pastels," and -- you guessed it -- we want to see you use pastel colors on your challenge entry.
Michael Kors has a beautiful one that you can find on Saks:
The best part is there is no door to door selling. Everything is done on the Internet.
2009: 1,134 deaths
B) Major Manglik Dosh:
And I’m right there on the floor beside them, having a grand old time. Pew! Pew! Oh, and the train tracks run right past the spaceport, yo.
You can visit the Sandylion Warehouse Sticker Outlet - it is located at 400 Cochrane Street in Markham, Ontario. Just take Highway 404, exit at Highway 7 and go East. Take your first right on East Valhalla, and another right on Cochrane. It is located in an industrial plaza type of area, but there are signs and you'll find it easily!
3) If price has dropped to at least 0.995 or less of the last buy-in level, I buy again.
When I first read As I Lay Dying as an M.A. student in Lewis Lawson’s 1973 Faulkner seminar at the University of Maryland, a woman in the class suddenly burst into tears one day as we were discussing this novel. “I’m sorry,” she whimpered, “but you are all speaking of this work from an objective position which I simply cannot share, having just gone through the death of my mother.” For years I have described this incident as being one the earliest indicators to me that the New Critical perspective of literature was about to crumble. The woman in our class, I now perceive, was correct in her assessment; by enfolding the popular vampire myth within this modernist masterpiece, perhaps Faulkner himself knew that he had created—as Darl describes Anse’s face upon the death of Addie—“a monstrous burlesque of all bereavement.”
Anyone who knows me knows that I can take stressing out to a whole new level. As one of my talents, I’m pretty darn good at it. In fact, I’m such a good stress monger, I’ll even take on your stress. Bring it on!
“I struggle. How about you?”
Sat 14th May Dominoes. Proceeds to church funds 9pm Start.
“That town was really easy to manage for the next few years,” Armendariz added.
Now age 29, Neil contacted Carol and asked her to help him!…. As an advocate, she helps people with their needs. The regenerative capabilities of umbilical cord blood stem cells have given patients with cerebral palsy significant improvements and a better quality of life. Neil desperately wants to be one of these as his time is running out…. Neil passed the first big test earlier this year when he was accepted for treatment, scheduled as follows:
And from Long and Short Romance Reviews:
Raining in through open windows.
Kitty Turgeon: Ms Turgeon is Executive Director of the Foundation for the Study of the Arts and Crafts Movement and Vice President for Education of the Roycrofters-at-Large Association, and recent recipient of the U.S. National Arts & Crafts Conference Lifetime Achievement Award. She holds a B.S. degree and a Master of Professional Services degree from the School of Hotel Administration, Cornell University.
Yes, some people are much worse off... those for instance who had to be evacuated on Iceland because of the risk of flooding. Yes, flooding! This is a glacier volcano. The melted ice will likely flood an area that is usually home to at least 1500 people. Sadly, nobody reports about these people, because everyone is really only worried about the billions of dollars the airlines are going to lose because of this incident. It's the worst incident since 9/11, and dare I say, it's worse than then, because air traffic was shut down for only a few days then, whereas now they have absolutely no idea how long this might last. Fortunately of course nobody was killed. Definitely something to be grateful for.
"Just before I wiped my bum on it! HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAH!"
This is what I love about charming men. They do not feel the need to corner every woman they may see as physically attractive. They may make a simple comment to let the woman know “he likey” and that’s it. And when a guy does this, ALL women are going to have a better day and feel good on the inside. And in my eyes part of a man’s charm is that he can create a spark in a woman and sometimes leave it at that. He uses even the smallest things to make a woman feel slightly good without compromising himself to look like a desperate dweeb supplicating to her.
Today is Koko's seventh birthday! It's reading week at seminary and Husband is in the process of tearing up the basement's carpet and putting laminate on the floors. He also did a lot of painting. As for me, I was working on birthday pie. It's our family tradition to eat our birthday cake/pie for breakfast.
I put a drop cloth on my dining room table and it took me an entire week to get all 25 frames painted with two coats. Yes, it took forever and yes, I wanted to give up, but in the end it was ALL WORTH IT!!!!!!!
But there is one date etched into the folds of my brain — May 23rd when I see Barry Manilow at the O2 in Dublin.
Now, you'll want to be sure to show her any areas that you think might be suspicious.
I looked up at the sky. “It’s shit like this that makes me hate you.”
Curtains are wide open and seeing as how it’s midnight I decide to shut them. Oh. Just kidding they dont actually shut. Aaahahahaa! Of course not. Pulling a chair over I figure them out and fix the damage. Yeah!
The power came back on fairly soon after that, so I recorded the music part by part and was very pleased with it!!!
As you can see from the pictures, the theme of the book is somewhat risque cakes – the idea of Cox Cookies and Cake, where Lanlard teamed up with shoe designer Patrick Cox, was to open a sexy cake shop. This is an interesting idea, achieved in the most part by making cakes that look like boobs or have little torsos on.
Bachmann: absolutely
I chuckled, but continued, "can you at least color the bird, because he wouldn't be covered in snow, and really it's part of your work."
If I may fetch a spoon.
Oct, 31st: C-Union Bar / Guangzhou (CH)
Wax On, Wax Off
Aging sucks because I’m a “ma’am” instead of a “miss.”
The country of Burma, known as Myanmar since 1989, has a long and fractious history. From 1886 until 1948, it was under the colonial power of England, and governed through India. It achieved independence in 1947 and elected Aung San as its leader, but he was quickly assassinated. In 1962, the country fell under the military rule of General Ne Win, who drove the nation into poverty and began the systematic persecution of the minority Karen group, and other “resident aliens” who are not recognized by the government as legitimate citizens.
Green is thought to relieve stress and studies have shown when used in a work environment workers suffer less stomach aches!
I saw a screening of the new Disney 3D movie John Carter (2012) (runtime 132 minutes. It's a pulp fiction, science fantasy romp on Mars. If you, like me, appreciate classic heroic fantasy and sword and sorcery, you might enjoy it. John Carter is an old-time fantasy adventure done up nicely with a big budget. But if you go see it, simply sit back and be entertained, don't expect it to be anything remotely possible.
If I may, I would just like to offer a few little things having to do with cleaning bathrooms while nursing babies, homeschooling, being 8 months preggo and not bendable, and in short, just having lots of kids. It's the reality factor that's missing from the books (less in Confessions, as the author raised five children; more in Home Comforts, the author of which had one child, and I truly believe you can do anything with one child, including have a clean house all the time!).
Hey everyone! Do you all remember the Jaws movies? I think you do because when I was little there was nothing more scary than that big white shark (well, Pennywise the clown was scarier, but shh). Jaws actually made me not want to go into the sea - ever. When I'm enjoying my day at the beach I'll never go further then my knees into the water. It's just really scary because I do not know what's beneath me. Now I'd like to leave my crazy personal traits here and show you my manicure. Yesterday I was watching Jaws and I thought it would be nice to make a Jaws manicure.
I am currently dancing between the good ol’ days and the rebirth days.
The answer came in a charity shop. There was an old copy of “Man walks into a pub”, marked up at 70p. A bit of bargaining with the old dear behind the counter and I got it down to 50p. “Bit tatty this book, give you 50p?”, “It’s for charity, sir. We sell things for charity”, “50p to whatever your collecting for is better than nowt”, withering look of scorn, “okay then sir, 50p it is”. Now I can take a look of withering scorn from a dotty old bat. 20p is 20p. Now you may think that it’s all for charity and I should have forked out the extra 20p, but charity begins with yours truly.
I used lots of bits from my scrap mountain for this one....didn't even make a dent, lol........and started with some brown stripy paper on the card base........all the edges of the pieces are lightly inked with pink .....sweet......
BIG MISTAKE...and I'm sure other cat owners will agree, a cat never forgets. I honestly believe this horrible man who calls himself a pet lover (and somehow is still in business) abused my sweet boy. What kind of vet complains that a cat scratched him? What does he expect in his business?
and the DT were doubly lucky and allowed to play with an image too. Just to give you the "heads up", there are several freebie images available from the Stamp Fairy that fit perfectly with this weeks theme!!! Ooohhh, without further suspense, this weeks theme is to celebrate that St Davids Day was on 1st March 2012 and is called . . .
Jeter has looked very good so far this season, including her electrifying anchor this past weekend at the Penn Relays. I expect something fast from her this weekend.
Taste: 5
O, sir, I find her milder than she was;
ROMANTIC/SPECIAL OCCASIONS: 610 Magnolia, Louisville; Brigtsen’s, New Orleans; The Fearrington House Restaurant, Pittsboro, NC; The General’s Daughter, Sonoma, CA; Hen of the Wood, Waterbury, VT; Joseph’s Table, Taos, NM; Le Gourmand, Seattle; Manresa, Los Gatos, CA; The Painted Lady, Newberg, OR; Paley’s Place, Portland, OR.
Promise something
Fear can be a robber of peace, an under miner of our faith. Yet even when our prayers sound more like accusations, still he cares for us. For the disciples, it served God’s purpose to eliminate the cause of their fear, demonstrating His power over nature. Because we now have Scripture to teach us the lesson that Jesus is God, such divine demonstration is no longer required. But he still cares about our circumstances and our fears. He may not choose to eradicate our source of fear. But if we allow him to, Jesus will calm our troubled hearts just like he calmed that storm.
1 red bell pepper chopped
He invites her to join him for dinner. The next thing he knows, the jukebox is playing, he and the woman are dancing, and he has his hands all over her firm, voluptuous charms. I'm guessing one of the other diners at the cafe probably said "For cryin' out loud, folks, get a room!"
What comes after this is a delightful mix of detective and mystery and an absolutely glorious old English ‘caper’ of a story.
And the stirring of dreams around
teasing our dogs!... they sure do think she is great looking if you know what I mean!!!
It's so fun that we can make some stupid thing sound so cool. Cause We are, so are our silly little stories.
We hiked up to the temple in the cold and passed a very important bridge. Around the temple there are Camillia trees, big bushy trees with perennial dark green leaves and red flowers that bloom either in spring, autumn or winter. We saw some chu-baek (autumn bloomers). In the middle of the temple there is a persimmons tree that, I was told, is “only for the bird’s snack.” There are some very large golden Buddhas inside, and incredible old paintings on the walls, mostly of dragons. It was explained to me that the Buddhists originated the term “samulnori”, and the sitting style of playing these instruments is very new. The traditional Korean style is to march or stand while others dance with head ribbons.
Well, 4 out of 6 items isn't bad, and I will definitely be making the pencil skirt later in the year and starting the cardigan fairly soon. Planning my projects made sure that I used some fabric and patterns from my stash, which I was pleased about, and already I can see that some items are getting more wear than others - my denim Crescent is a firm favourite.
After that, I was given the ability to look at someone’s Loyalty card. I picked Brent, mainly because the Admiral (Mink) had already been checked, I didn’t really think Andrew or Parker were cylons as they’d done nothing suspicious, and checking Frank’s Loyalty card would be less useful since he, like me, also got two to start so I’d have a 50-50 shot of maybe picking his ‘You Are A Cylon” card, IF he even had one. I also picked Brent because he has a tendency to be a super sketchy player in general, and his first act in the game is always to try to gain the presidency.
Nail It Down
My faith. It keeps be grounded and assures me that no matter what comes my way, I'll be okay.
I have Super Powers, it's true! It's really true! I wear the cloak of invisibility. You don't know how many times, I have been walking through a store to have people stare right through me. Pushing their carts into me like I wasn't even there. Jumping out of the way to protect myself. I've complained for years to KT about my super power, which by the way, I don't really think is all that super. A few weeks ago, he witnessed my super power in action as someone pushed right into me, as I was dodging baskets between two other people. "What the heck was that about?" he asked me..."Oh, just my super powers at work..." Even Saturday, a woman at Hobby Lobby was blocking the whole aisle. I kindly said, "Excuse me, please" to which she glanced at me but continued to block the aisle until it suited her to move. Just another day shrouded in my cloak of invisibility...
A critical look of Al Gore by Stevens, which is of great interest for the current campaign.
My father used to tell a story that took place when he was probably in his late thirties. He was standing in line at the bank with my grandfather, who turned to him and said something like, "Have you talked to Mommy today?" (Insert the sound of falling levels of testosterone...)
IBUs: 15
Inks - Basic Gray, Pool Party, and Regal Rose
But after he said yes I got all excited and started
It will be beneficial if you keep track of all of your tax documentation throughout the year instead of waiting until tax time. You can easily access receipts, healthcare statements, insurance papers, etc. by grouping them together for when taxes are near.
trans by may-brit akerholt
the slightest communication from any
And our prize this week is a special magazine called "Cards & More" and
Sharks bit fewer people each year than New Yorkers, according to Health department records. Another piece of her trivia journalist research. It was beguiling to know she was more likely to die in the bathtub or be murdered by her lover than to die in the jaws of a shark. The movie ‘Jaws’ had done the animals a disservice. She strained to look through the moving waves to discover if one followed the boat, but there was only clear sandy bottom below the hull.
Here's a couple of cute, quick ideas that might help you put a smile on your Valentine's face this year!
Gates went further to say: “That’s true for everyone from the retail store worker who uses a handheld scanner to track inventory to the chief executive who uses business intelligence software to analyse critical market trends.
Article 9 of the Charter provided for the creation of a lay body, the National Review Board, which was mandated (among other things) to commission a descriptive study of the nature and scope of the problem of child sexual abuse in the Catholic Church.
18:30 GMT: The city was calm throughout the day and I haven’t heard shots for a couple of days now. The Bamako airport has reopened and some outbound flights managed to depart on Thursday. A team of Nigerian footballers who got stuck here when the airport closed is looking forward to going home, having been visited at their hotel yesterday morning by heavily armed Malian troops, no doubt on the hunt for those infamous mercenaries at large.
009.073 YUSUFALI: O Prophet! strive hard against the unbelievers and the Hypocrites, and be firm against them. Their abode is Hell,- an evil refuge indeed.
Everyone, meet my dad. His name is Kent Argyle and he's a bit of a prankster (I inherited the trait). Here he is holding my cute niece.
“Did you notice a sign in the front of my house that said ‘Dead N****er Storage’?!!!??!!”
We had 4.6 seconds to get to the bus stop...no Wii...but time for
And so, this evening I tweeted my opposition to congratulate them on their victory and to wish them well leading the Australian Blogging Community into 2011.
a pint with the
NOTE: You should finish all the steps in order for your entry to qualify.
3. Knowing that Native Americans were already here, and Columbus never was here, why does anyone go along with the myth that "Columbus Discovered America", when we all know it is not true?
I love you just the same.
Hoot Suite is an app you can use to post to and view information on your social media sources: Facebook, LinkedIn, Twitter, Foursquare, and more. It makes updating all statuses a little easier, while still allowing you the opportunity to view other’s status updates, and tweets.
Tracy Evans created decorated for Easter, covered with text from Alice in Wonderland book pages and adorned with a lace trimmed Alice! There are so many details to love! The inside of the egg is covered with crackle paint; what a perfect finish for an egg! I love the bottle cap with the A in the center of the text flower made of more Alice book pages.
His own family had to witness exclusion and had to be apprehensive to be pusuited. So his grandfather decided to escape from germany in 1934, heading to Britain. This must never happen again, Andy says, and he tells about his worries about right-wing partys in Europe, which seem to get more popular again.
Reading Gurjinder Basran’s Everything Was Good-bye is making me feel really sorry for my sex. I mean, I know women have struggled throughout history…to have equal pay, to work, to vote, to feel safe at home and out on the street…but, most of the time, the framework in which I have studied and read about these issues is about breaking down staunch, patriarchal institutions and the cultural beliefs that these institutions create.
One should then not expect that thorough experience of the art form would lead to a more permissive stance and less categorical damnation of this and that. Knowledge doesn't necessarily lead to less hard opinions. Most of the people I know who are metal encyclopaedias (myself included) engage in this self-identification as well, though perhaps their opinions might be less broad and more nuanced here and there. It seems much of what drives an impulsive information cataloger is an addiction to the social gaming applications of their knowledge. Poor Socrates who knew too much yet professed to know too little, not a sterling example for most.
What is your advice to other young writers?
I’m still looking for other options of sugar-free drinks, outside of water. I’ve found one, a half tea/half lemonade that has a good taste, but I need more options. Any suggestions?
Give each egg a quick tap on counter to crack before placing in a bowl with ice water. If you’re not going to use them right away, put them in ice water without cracking and store in fridge for up to 3 days before using.
Have you ever been to Italy?
As your constituent, I am writing to ask you to join the House Small Brewers Caucus, co-chaired by Representatives Peter DeFazio and Denny Rehberg.
5 tablespoons unsalted butter, melted and still hot
I remember a couple years back you personally tried to prove the public you’re being able to fit into size zero pants! I rolled on the ground laughing when I heard of that one. I’m not sure who you think you’d been able to fool, but your body is as much a size zero than mine: call it a daydream. LOL
And then my back gets injured as a complication of childbirth. I have a baby and a toddler and I am stuck alone in the middle of *nowhere* on a farm with essentially a broken back. The baby has “colic” and screams for hours on end. Turns out he has a casein allergy. And an egg allergy. Since I already don’t eat red meat, pork or any of the other things you aren’t supposed to consume while breastfeeding (most fish/seafood, cruciferous vegetables, etc.) this seriously limits my diet. I am now a towering epiphany of hypocrisy – a cattle farmer that neither eats red meat nor drinks milk.
3 scallions sliced on the bias
The tendency in avant-garde music is to emphasize constant innovation and change, but sometimes an improv record need not shatter boundaries to be really great. This trio set, a document of an intimate apartment concert in Greece, is a perfect example. The slow-moving textural improvisation here isn't ground-breaking, nor is it especially surprising coming from these musicians, but it is excellent, a concise thirty-minute exploration of glacial layers of sound. Over the course of this single piece, after the tranquil introductory minutes, the trio begins organizing sedimentary layers comprised of Ferran Fages' electronics, Nikos Veliotis' buzzing, sustained cello drones, and the subterranean rumble of Robin Hayward's tuba. It's great because the drone is anything but monolithic, and close listening reveals the shifting tectonic plates within, as the instrumentalists weave their long tones around one another. This intense droney segment is bookended by spacious scrape-and-hum build-up at the beginning, and a serene coda in which Fages' sine waves slowly pulse atop a gentle bed of little rumbles and the occasional fluttery moan from Hayward's tuba. This is a low-key but surprisingly dynamic disc, and a really enjoyable one. [buy]
Price: $17.95
Mark Valentine – The Axholme Toll
-Post good photos of yourself. Make sure that photos are current and represent what you actually look like. No one wants to see your class picture from 8th grade because it’s cute or funny. They want to see what their potential date looks like right now.
If you don’t know say so.
we told stories. we laughed. we laughed some more.
Rules straight from Alex's post:
And so, having finally completed Mission: Iceland, we headed back to our hotel to gear up for the next day, but not before RJ got this shot that I’m hoping he wins some sort of award for:
Yoochun smile then put another two fingers and move with scissor movement. Junsu bit Yoochun’s shoulder and his husband doesn’t mind. Junsu pumps Yoochun’s member faster till it hard like rock.
So after hefting the kayaks out of storage, squeezing into life jackets designed for elementary school kids and a quick crash course in paddling we hit the lake.
In review, value the face-to-face conversation, two, show up in the workplace with a good attitude and lastly, marry a good attitude with your skills to get ahead in this world.
March is National Reading Month. My school's theme this year is something along the lines of our ancestors and how they arrived to America. There's a fancy name for it, but I can't remember it right now... oops!
Moving beyond the bare feet, they continue to downplay the fact that Gloria is Theee Gatekeeper, many consider her the de-factor Chief of Staff - in which case, looking at our budget short fall we could do salary savings and elimnate Ed Wolf; it isn't just that she sits in on meetings - we hear that she has sat on the arm of his chair with her arm wrapped around him, she's patting his knee. Don't you think that is disconcerting for people trying to discuss their business with this adolescent behavior? What kind of an impression does this leave? How many people decide to forego talking to the Mayor because they don't want to deal with Gloria or can't get pass Gloria? It's not only where does Mark end and she begin, it's also where does Ed begin and end versus Gloria? And if the lap dance thing is not true - it's become part of the story and is perceived to be true, perception is reality.
I'm finally getting some justice. And please note, I call this "justice" and not "revenge". Two different things. I want to talk about it, and want to share the whole story, and I will, very soon. Let's just sum it up like this:
Cattle Decapitation- Monolith of Inhumanity (METULZ!!!)
Wow I'm a manager so do I get more money?" I demand.
I highly recommend this book! Check out the following if you liked this novel:
Will this child be a future benefit to society?
EOH: The media and the committee made Frank’s words to you appear that he was concerned about a potential conflict of interest on your part.
Illamasqua Underworld Lipstick (in counter photo)
Llanerch is an ever-growing venture of Ryan Davies and his family team, and currently comprises a bar, bistro, boutique hotel rooms (which viewers of Channel 4’s ‘Four in a Bed’ show may well be familiar with, after a recent appearance!), the vineyard, offering tours and tasting, and of course the cookery school. A very grey and rainy evening couldn’t dampen the spirits of the assembled guests there to celebrate Angela’s first year!
At first Scrivener was only available for Mac, then they made a PC version, but soon (very soon I hope) Scrivener will come to iPad. That's exciting news for me, especially since the newest iPad just about replaces laptops. Check out the latest news on that:
Don't worry about the centers of this layer not touching it will be covered up by subsequent petal layers. TIP: I sewed all the petals from the center out to keep them flat, sometimes I had to pass a quite a bit of the pillowcase under the needle to get to the center but it turned out alright in the end.
 Blomkvist, Mikael – Casting Blomkvist, Daniel Craig on Film Acting, Dressing Blomkvist, Investigation (stills) photogallery,
Sometimes it feels easy.
The reasons they gave for “mic” were similar to those offered by students before. It’s what you see on signs for “open mic night.” There’s no “k” in microphone. “Mic” is more contemporary.
on them as teenagers, I move on to ask her about the female-ness of
* Peel and chop the feijoas quite small, dropping the pieces into the lemon water as you go.
30 Days of Autism is a project designed to promote social understanding and offer a glimpse into the perspectives of those whose lives are touched by ASD.
In summary….Yes, there are cheaper printing options out there for these types of products but I will definitely say MOO products are a step above. And credit or no credit from MOO I'll stand by that. As designers we are always printing projects and believe me we have seen the best and worst of custom printing. You'll pay a little more at MOO but will get more than you expect. And what makes them different and why I'd choose MOO over others is the Printfinity technology that allows you to use multiple images on the same project. Every holiday I am torn between what family photo to use and with MOO you can use a different image on every card if you wanted to. So super cool! It's such a great concept for businesses/bloggers/artists with a portfolio of images they can showcase on cards or maybe the mom creating play date or holiday cards.
Really want to see her again, but can't really afford £46 for Paloma Faith tickets plus the £40-odd petrol to London and back... bah. Here's to hoping she will be touring again very soon!
I'm so excited to have these and will wear them when I go see MCR in May.
18) Catalina
So, to the doctor we went. And we weren’t at the doctor very long before we were told they would like little Abby to see a pediatric dermatologist and have an MRI at Denver Children’s Hospital just as a precaution. The doctor didn’t like that the birthmark is on her head. She also didn’t like that it is so large and finally she didn’t like the color(s) of it.
For me, the fall makes my body, soul and mind all yearn at once for a new way to understand myself in relation to the world; I want to do familiar things in unfamiliar places; I want to see familiar objects from unfamiliar perspectives; I want to overwhelm myself and make sense of it at a later time.
genuine, rare and knowing?
1:00 p.m.: The ORTM TV news shows footage of alleged looters arrested by the security forces. The claim is that they were actually civilians who somehow acquired military uniforms and profited from the disorder of the last few days to ransack government offices and private homes. The camera pans over a truckload of looted goods (televisions, refrigerators, furniture) that are now supposed to be returned to their rightful place. In a separate ORTM interview, Capt. Sanogo had claimed that the troops out looting in Bamako were in fact civilians who had gotten into uniform expressly to discredit the CNRDR.
You thought dating was complicated? Have a kid and see how crazy that shit gets lool! …
So I am asking anyone reading this, anyone who loves my baby boy, to consider taking a few minutes to write a little note to Elliot, and sending me a picture of you/your family, and the state/country you live in to include in this project. It doesn't matter if we're close friends, or if you've followed our story silently up until now. And your message doesn't need to be long, or anything profound; simple is great! I can't tell you how much I would appreciate it!
This used to be the easiest answer for me. It was always the Cybermen. Daleks, like Andrew, I thought were dull. Really, really not scary and not too hard to run away from. Cybermen were virtually unbeatable (except of course if you happened to have a wrinkly old woman from the Sixteenth Century who came with her own gold arrows… ahem), and they were determined. And Colin Baker’s brush with them (The Attack of The Cybermen), is an overlooked gem.
7And one of the four beasts gave unto the seven angels seven golden vials full of the wrath of God, who liveth for ever and ever.
It is said that while in the womb (and also as very young children) we are in a natural state of one-ness, love, union, innocence, bliss. Then after a while, gradually as we grow up in the world, we begin to realise that "I am this and you are that", "I am here and you are there", "I am me and you are you". We start to feel separate, we become 'self-conscious', we become afraid.
say that out loud because we need to beat Obama
Very important to say that or the goofy man will let all the buttery goodness grill off by putting them butter side down.
Joe Schmidt’s side cruised through a pool consisting of Bath, Glasgow and Montpellier before dismantling Cardiff Blues at the Aviva stadium in the quarter-finals.
There are a lot of classic zombie films but I’m going to look at a few I like…and one of the best has got to be Shaun of the Dead. Besides my slight crush on Simon Pegg…this movie is hilariously funny and takes the mick out of the genre. Zombie Type – slow-moving.
Whilst not quite a crazy firestarter, I must confess to getting some deep pleasure from watching fires, and particularly poking around at them and seeing what happens. Luckily, we have a real fire in the house (though bonfires are another source of amusement) and when the children are in bed and Mr T is working lates or nights I can quite happily play with the fire all night. I like letting it almost die, then trying some strange configuration of not-quite-dry logs to see if they'll burn, and how, or else how little coal I have to put on, and where, to make things burn. Coal dust, which gathers at the bottom of the scuttle, is a real delight - it will completely smother a fire, but get it just right and after a while it ignites explosively as if it is a single entity. Newsprint burns with different colours depending, I deduce, on the inks used. I could go on ad infinitum actually, as the permutations are endless but fairly boring unless you are an arsonist. And I've met a few.
The environment will continue to manifest change as it supports our transition into a more conscious planetary attitude. The way to work with the environment this month is to always consciously choose for yourself the power it is manifesting through various expressions. Since we are in a volatile time, we could experience more earth activity, quakes, volcanic activity, and interesting wind and water events. There is tremendous power in these events that can be harnessed for your own bids. This requires a commitment to whatever the weather and environment happens to be doing and manifesting. The next time you are in an intense weather event, rather than resisting it, see if you can harness the power of it and commit 100 percent to it. Being present with what is happening is always a good idea. It is the shamanic way of neutrality and non-resistance that keeps you always in the power position and not ever victimized by what is out of your control.
We got home around 7:45 to find a sleeping baby and a crocheting Aunt.
In an overt attempt to prevent the President from exercising his authority during this period, Republican Senators insisted on using a gimmick called “pro forma” sessions, which are sessions during which no Senate business is conducted and instead one or two Senators simply gavel in and out of session in a matter of seconds.
192 ***4. “The Teacher as Learner: On Discussion.” Claremont Review of Books, Summer 1985, pp. 22-23. (Source: Item D-XI/30/1984, below. Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 591-95 (1992).)
With the exception of Electronic Renaissance the album style is very Belle and Sebastian, eventhough there are a variety of instruments and styles used. Hamdclaps, organ, brass, keyboards and strings. There is even a passage read from Rip Van Winkle.
The Frontier model is something else again. It also had a powerful expansionist dynamic, but it was egalitarian rather than hierarchical, and didn’t provide anybody with a convenient place to hook up a wealth pump. What Frontier culture craved from expansion was simply real estate, where people could build a cabin, break the sod, plant crops, and make a life for themselves. Over time, as the model ripened and values shifted, it gave rise to a vision of American expansion in which an entire continent would be seeded first with frontier homesteads, then with prosperous farms and nascent towns, and replicate political and economic democracy straight across to the Pacific. What would happen once that limit was reached was a question very few Americans asked themselves.
to be mercurial, uncharted, constantly inconstant -
2. Become a follower of Aud Sentiments
When I get to school, the wind is blowing hard and I do everything I can to get from the car to the building without losing my loot. (Hair is a lost cause, at this point.) As soon as I walk in the building, the heat and humidity hits me like a wave. The district tries to save money by turning off the air system over extended holidays. So our two story building feels like an oven until about 11. Yay x 2.
Nome do Lab: Managing Windows Server “8″ with Server Manager and PowerShell 3.0
This extract is from a poem about desire. When you want to emphasize a word in Dutch you can put an accent marker on it. She does this with kán which is why I put CAN in capitals.
SRU7 Snake Charming
All along, it was such a false sense of hope. My father's security is based in his consumption. He prides himself with his money and his status. When I chose to give up all of those things, to simply love my child the best way I knew how, he felt rejected, and couldn't tolerate my independence and autonomy. In many ways, it has fueled the competitive and head strong nature in me, to find a way to make staying home work for us, to find a way to prove him wrong. It's also been very sad...this isn't how I pictured my life...this isn't how I wanted things to go. In the midst of all of these feelings, all of this grief, I came face to face with the reality that my dad is a narcissist. Everything in his life is an extension of him. The pressure I felt to be perfect, the pressure to prove myself to him, the pressure to follow his way of life...if I made even the tiniest of "mistakes" I was unloved, unwanted. The strong relationship I thought we built, in reality, was one based on the non-verbal agreement that I do what he said...that I follow his "infinite wisdom." When I chose against his judgment, he couldn't tolerate it. He said miserable things. It felt terrible to read the things he wrote in those emails, to
Immediately after she had her stroke and was in the hospital, our family was trying to decide what to do with her in regards to treatment. It was an tricky ethical situation. My grandmother couldn’t express what she wanted. We wanted to send her to short term stay in a rehabilitation center, in hopes that it would get her somewhat independent again. However, we didn’t know for sure if she would ever gain her complete independence back. She couldn’t talk and could barely move the right side of her body. If there was any hope of her getting better, sending her to a rehab center would have to be the way to go, though. I knew she was absolutely terrified and against the idea of going to a rehabilitation center. I’m sure she thought she would never leave and thought we were going to leave her and forget about her in some nursing home.
6. Spill milk on your new pillows. Cover the stains with crayons. How does that look?
Monday I woke up and was feeling pretty good, and my computer science teacher sympathized with me because he said he’s had a migraine before and that I could just take the test Wednesday (today). But during my last class of the day at 11 I started having problems seeing again. It was a little different though – you know when you look at the sun and it kind of burns a big spot into your eye for a while? It was like that when I looked at my professor, only I hadn’t been recently looking at the sun. It didn’t last as long as Friday, but then my headache came back and it was angry. I was supposed to go get help with a computer science project that was due today but instead I went to sleep for about 3 hours. I felt better when I got up though.
Mario Kart (questionable to call it a sports game)
Exsoteric: Are there any celebrities you have yet to work with and who you would love to dress?
9. I Live My Life
Don't let 'em spoil your fun
If you would like an e-mail reminder about the party let us know in the comments. Make sure you leave your e-mail address with your comment. We will happily add you to the list.
Financing. Many espresso franchises have assets to help those who want to buy into the franchise find financing. Some do not however. If there are opportunities for financing inside the franchise this can be a plus to many could be franchise homeowners whereas others prefer to come up with their very own financing. A few franchises also require those who purchase into the franchise to have a certain sum of money to invest along with any financing. That you must hammer out all of the advantageous print and monetary details before making any choices or belongings purchases.
So there you have it….lots of info that you should know before giving birth. Sure, not all women experience ALL of these symptoms (you lucky ducks…). You may only experience one. But if you plan on having more than one child, it is good info to keep tucked away so you are prepared for the future. Remember…in the end, it is worth it all. If it meant that Abbie was healthy and happy, I’d experience it all over again tenfold.
The verb “to hear” only exists to describe sounds, whether it being something someone “is hearing” (active) or something “being heard” (passive). In both and any of the cases it is impossible to escape the implication that the act of listening and the object “being heard” are present. However, the act of listening itself, as it happens, cannot be described solely with words. The act of listening happens when sounds are present. Words make no sounds. We may want to turn words into sounds. There are ‘sounds’ we hear in our minds, perhaps, when we read words, but we cannot demonstrate them to others easily – we simply assume them to be able to hear something similar to what we do within our minds. Written language is a system invented to help in keeping and maintaining understandings that are reached initially through sounds. Such so-called “understandings” are the relationships between concepts, generating ‘logics’ that render the language ‘functional’ and ‘practical’ through the sharing of such logics.
The connections between music and my writing that shimmer. Sometimes secrets that I see within or between my lines as I’m reading them to an audience (the helicopter of “Becoming” flew right out of PJ Harvey’s “This Mess We’re In”). What a word’s done to the page when its more private history becomes a part of this public object or piece. Haruki Murakami’s The Wind-Up Bird Chronicle. Titanium and silver rings. Love that feeds the comfort to write.
Our lucky random winner this week is...
2. Once all of the ingredients form a ball, place the ball on a work surface, and knead the dough for approximately 10 minutes. Alternatively, use a stand mixer fitted with the dough hook and mix at low speed for 10 minutes. As the dough is mixing, continue to add flour, a tablespoon or two at a time, until the dough clears the sides of the bowl and is tacky but not sticky.
Tiffany has graciously donated (2) images to our 3rd place Tea Time Terrific Top Three Winner, (4) images to our 2nd place TTTTT Winner, (6) images to our 1st place TTTTT Winner ... and (10) images for The Shabby Tea Room Winner - WOW!!!
we (brad, beau, michelle, mikayla & i) went out for lunch with my parents, my brother billy, and his lovely wife, debbie. we all have a great time!
A “reasoned response”. And a “worst case” scenario in which Goldman crime is decriminalised. Amazing.
A good example to bring up as an area where Africa could learn from China, is China’s regulatory framework facing increased FDI in its computer industry. In order to attract FDI as well as contemporarily achieve global competitiveness and develop its national capabilities, China not only promoted computer production and encouraged enterprises to enter the computer industry, but most importantly required foreign firms to transfer technology in return to market access. The main policy of China at that stage was learning from outsiders without surrendering technological or economic control, by catching up technologically while maintaing central control over key aspects of the economy, reducing its dependence on foreign technologies. China’s policy of exchanging market access for foreign technology has been characterized by requiring foreign firms to transfer technology and form alliances with domestic companies. The government also slowed down foreign firms and increased their costs with certification processes regarding quality, local content and export limits in order to allow the domestic firms more time to become established. Contemporarily, in order to also increase overseas foreign direct investment (OFDI), the Chinese government promoted new policies reducing red tape, simplifying procedural mechanisms and increasing support from state institutions towards new investments. There is definitely a lot which African governments could learn from this model. While many factors, such as the Western imposed economic environment, are obstacles to the development of independent policies by African governments, the Chinese private companies investments are giving Africa a “second chance”. Due to increased competition, the African governments increasingly have policy independence and if willing, they could be able to regulate their economies so as to guarantee the beneficial spillovers from FDI.
As many as 50% of the officers involved in the murder investigation accepted this view. Their arguments cannot simply be brushed aside as Macpherson is trying to do. Yet Macpherson attacks the police for daring to hold a different point of view:
1 hope
I returned to the hostel to nap before Emma arrived! Then once we were reunited we set off on adventures! We went to Potsdamer Platz and took the fastest elevator in Europe? The world? To the 24th floor of a building and had fantastic views of the city. Then we had dinner on Simon dach Strasse, getting dessert at Cupcakes Berlin before it closed! Afterwards we walked the east side Berlin wall gallery, and took the S-bahn to see the Reichstag and Brandenburg Gate at night. I think I showed Emma the best/my favorite sites of Berlin while seeing some new things too!
